I'm still chugging away at Worlds Apart, our Fantasy game based upon the OGL version of Traveller. I'm editing and enjoying that moment when you read something that you wrote and feel the desire to start gaming. I thinking that I mayrelease the Worlds Apart rules as a free PDF and have a pay version that includes art. I've never done this before, so am a bit hesitant to do so, but I'm thinking about it.
We startet in St. Louis, that's in France, near to the Swiss Frontiers in Basel.
Watch Cheryl talk about her shoe collection below.
I don’t remember Ma scream for help.
Now, you probably already knew that crunches won’t burn your belly fat off. You’re clever like that, I know! But ab exercises will make those muscles look awesome, once you burn-through, if that is really your goal.
that the moon was hollowed out artificially, which means that it was done by some intelligence.
So far something like 270 jobs in Statistics Canada are gone. Plus something like 635 in Parks Canada. Cuts will affection Corrections Canada, border security, food inspectors and other vital areas.
Tom Hanks (Forrest Gump)
We had so many calls and well-wishes from friends and family who spotted us, and my son already has a copy pinned up in his room. Thanks to the fab reporter, Jamie Knodel, for helping me to sound somewhat coherent!
One day in the early nineties her husband came home with a desktop computer and sat her in front of it. “Now you have no more excuses,” he said, and she realized the truth in his words. Procrastination, now no longer an option, she took off on the pursuit of penning her first book. Though that book, a young adult fantasy, was lost due to unforeseen circumstances, she kept going, writing a historical romance, and another YA.
when people visit our stall!
In fact, Heritage Keepers contains little or no information about puberty, anatomy, sexually transmitted diseases, or sexual behavior. Instead, most of its lessons are devoted to promoting the importance of heterosexual marriage and the value of abstinence before marriage. Students are asked to take virginity pledges and class time is devoted to having students envision and plan their wedding days. Heritage Keepers also teaches students that:
“So you were not romantically involved with Dr. Hamilton?”
Plot: B+
What this story teaches us is that Jesus will not stop until he removes authority from evil, and assumes this authority by his actions, and ultimately by his death. Mark 1 is a mini-preparation for the season of Lent when we will consider the remarkable and world-altering days before the crucifixion of our Lord.
3. Unanswered emails in my inbox.
I want more
How many of us will come to the end of our lives satisfied with what we have done? At that stage we will probably think, “I wish I had done more with that which God gave me.” Assuredly no one will say, “I did too much.”
People have problems because they choose them. They choose these problems because they are easier than the problems they are saving them from.
Sun Gyun, son of a great portrait artist, became a comic artist in order to pay back a particular debt which might cost him his late father’s only painting at stake. Though blessed with his fathers talent, he himself has no talent in making a good storyline, in which Gang Hee was hired in order to fill in the story-writer post. By hook or by crook, they tried their best meeting a comic competition dateline, but in the end discovered that they have feelings for each other.
monsters starve there –
The dust in the air enough to drown in.
A light! A light! At last a light!
snicker snack
Professional Staff at CWFL
Since an extensive (5 minutes) google search found nothign on this, I am going to claim (rightfully so) that I was teh first person to state on the internet that the "Seizling Institute" in the film Adam Resurrected is the same as the bad guys hideout in Quantum of Solace.
Athlete and global messenger Amanda Church, who was also competing on the Norvatis, Easton team spoke during the opening ceremonies saying, “I think my teammates can agree with me on this, that Bio-Ball is one of our favorite competitions to be a part of every year.”
A fuel stop at the nontowered Cross City Airport, 30 miles north of Cedar Key, bestows a smidgen of extra confidence for the journey to and from Cedar Key’s George T. Lewis Airport, which has no FBO or fuel service. A credit card activates Cross City’s self-serve fuel pump 24/7, and if you stop in during daylight hours you receive an abundance of unconditional love from Orville, the airport pooch.
Digital Images! Definitely hooked on them! My life is such that I'm really busy with work and family, so my creative time sometimes falls short. I love having a handful of digital images all printed in the sizes I want and ready to go, so when time allows, I can grab them and my Copics and get a little coloring time in. No muss, no fuss.... I'm pretty messy with ink pads and embossing powder!
M.S: It's allowing yourself to be yourself, but your best self. Allowing your dreams and talents to take you where you are meant to go. Finding your true purpose and seeking to fulfill it.
Friday - Spaghetti with fresh homemade sauce
5 literacies: attention, participation, collaboration, crap detection, network know-how
Love, love, love, love, loved it! I've been telling people, don't read it if you don't want to be challenged! It's convicting, inspiring, faith-stretching, and thought-provoking! I've been lucky enough to have the opportunity to do two of Jennie's Bible studies before they were officially released and hear her speak twice, and I think she is just wonderful. SO real and relate-able. Get the book!! :)
If you have identified the cause of the RSI quickly, and then take appropriate measures to prevent it occurring again, the problem should resolve itself.
Hope you enjoyed this one woman’s manifesto on quaspeqs. I’m going to leave you with pics of a few more of my quaspeqs so that you can see the variety in quaspeq design. Enjoy.
I think this table setting makes for a casual comfortable environment when guests arrive.
I don't know why I haven't wanted to blog. Partially I guess because this pregnancy has consumed me. Second is there's a LOT going on with my pregnancy but so much of it is more personal that I *should* share and I am trying to respect my Eric's desire for me not to share everything about this. After all, me being pregnant has everything to do with him.
We set the disc spinning, at a precise 33 and a third revolutions per minute.
Even when you get used to the small quarters, you still have to learn how to deal with the noises and burps that emanate from those who have cubicles across, behind, next to and catty-cornered to yours. Just like there are common courtesies between neighbors who live next door to you, whether you’re in an apartment, condo, duplex, or single-family home, there are some considerations that must be given to the people who must work in a cubicle nearby.
All of a sudden it dawned on me - sure, the tough times are only temporary, but so are the good times. Emily isn't always going to want me to snuggle with her before she goes to bed. She isn't going sit in her highchair, sign "all done" and continue to eat with a smile on her face. She isn't going to pull her little doggy around the living room and laugh everyday. She isn't going to run to me and smile everytime I pick her up from school. She isn't always going to blow kisses to her daddy before she goes to bed. All of those things are only temporary.
this postsecret both delighted and disturbed me.
By the beginning of the 19th Century, there were white men living and working amongst the tribes of North America and Canada, but nobody would think to question the Native Americans claims to be the Indigenous First people of America (more of which later).
This was a relatively easy day. Nicki had to visit three radio stations along the way, but it was a short drive for us down to the White Horse,Stony Stratford. So far on the tour we'd played country music clubs and this was a music pub, so we were looking forward to playing a different selection of songs.
As Practical Money Skills tells us, immediately contact the fraud departments of each of the credit bureaus and alert them that you are a victim of identity theft, and request that a fraud alert be placed in your file. You can also request a security freeze, preventing credit issuers from obtaining access to your credit files without your permission. This prevents thieves from opening up new credit cards in your name.
Sorry for english
September 1 Buffalo Athens $45 each
I had this motorbike ride with my childhood friend, air on my hair, the laughter,it was just lots of fun…
My entry for The Play Date Cafe Challenge 52. The inspiration is gorgeous... and they are celebrating their first anniversary. So hop over and play along.
And I think that all the hand-wringing about what is "stabilizing" and what isn't is ossified Cold War reasoning. "Stability" was championed, theoretically, because anything else would 'tip the world into war,' as TH said.
The First Lady, during her announcement, hailed LMCC as a critical program, because more than half of America's children under the age of five participate in daycare, and they are literally ballooning.
Left: A passage in the bunker - admit it, you wouldn't want to go down there either.
If this is the case, there will be a form of respondent superior attached to the case because the physician should have been supervising the PA or NP more closely. Respondent superior is a concept that takes into consideration an employer/employee relationship where the employer is responsible for the actions of his or her employee. To prove this, elements to the case must include: 1) the PA or NP was negligent and did not meet the standard of care, and 2) that there was an employer/employee relationship consisting of a “Master-Servant” relationship. In 1957, the MD Court of Appeals put forth five factors to be considered in this type of relationship: a) selection and engagement of the servant, b) payment of wages, c) power to discharge (fire), d) power to control the servant’s conduct, and e) whether the work was part of the normal business of the employer.
Above a sunless sea!
A pattern is emerging and though like a strong keg beer drinker, I could claim quality over quantity, I won't. So loins girded, I better get my arse in gear this year.
This recipe uses leftover veg, those scraggly bits of celery that have seen better days, a limptastic carrot, and a stray onion. We all have these ingredients rattling around our fridges from time to time! The quantities don’t really matter, use whatever is in the fridge. What makes this soup Super Speedy is that you can chuck in a bag of frozen Mediterranean vegetables – available from most supermarkets. While the texture of these is not great for eating from a plate – they work perfectly in a soup blend. Courgettes, peppers, aubergines etc.
2 Lg Bunches Baby Mustard Greens
How do we heal a crippled church? Not by silver or gold or by the latest growth theory but by union with Jesus – the One in whom is the resurrection of the dead.
The new version of Vacum had a period of long synth based songs which gradually changed to shorter and much more snappy songs and the single Dagar i Morgon was that version of the band at its best. Magnus background as an actor also added to the band resulting in better live shows. The band toured a lot and the third album Flugor och Rosor was recorded at extreme speed.
Universe
But on reading articles about the topic, it is amusing to compare the coverage to the Greek crisis. Whereas with Greece the blame was all on the Greeks, there doesn’t appear to be a similar blame-game going on with Ireland.
4. Don't answer anymore questions,
Verbeek C. Moederschapsbescherming: Een case studie. Problemen van Arbeidsgeneeskunde 1995; 132-152.
In order to keep your fitted skirts comfy and fun to wear, keep these factors in mind:
Cook pasta according to package directions. Add broccoli, 3 minutes before pasta is cooked.
I have put togheter a little of this and that for you. Heres a pic of the candy.
From the very beginning, the government has tried to create divisions among the slum dwellers. Creating a split between the dwellers of the two evicted slums of 30th March (viz. Majdur Palli and Shramik Colony), and those of Lakepalli, Bhai-bhai Colony and other nearby slums is the government’s agenda. Deliberate and false propaganda is being spread that the dwellers of the two evicted slums had obtained rehabilitation flats from the government and after selling that off, they are suddenly squatting by building shanties in the open field, in lure of new flats. It is also being said that these people are actually backed by land mafias, NGOs and Maoists. Coming from outside, these people are the ones who are trying to disturb the peace in Nonadanga. On the other hand the chief minister is saying that they have not and will not evict anybody.
You see, it ties in with marriage. Love. Faith. Marriage. And I have been able to have the fortune to witness those in actions.
Maybe sometimes, we've got it wrong, but it's alright
The contest was the Delmont-Ross Writing Contest, with a $5000 prize, and prominent s.f. writer Ben Bova was hired to judge it. Trouble was, there was only one entry...Mitchell's own. So of course Ben declared the sole entrant to be the winner, which was according to the rules. (Ben thought this odd, but rules are rules, and most writers aren't as scam conscious as Victoria and I are.)
When South Africa was governed by a racist white minority, it was scorned by the West and treated as Saddam Hussein was, with boycotts and sanctions. Now that a racist, black-majority government controls the country; that it is as violent as Iraq, Liberia, or the Congo and rapidly becoming another Islamist- friendly, failed African state, it is the toast of the West.
So now when I am googled as The Burton Review, that fake site comes up. GRRR!! In an effort to not have another fake site pop up, I have again purchased another domain, http://www.burtonbookreview.com/ but the blogspot domain will auto-direct you to the current site, thankfully. When you have time, update your bookmarks and links to http://www.burtonbookreview.com/ and I would really appreciate it so very much. The more times Burton Book Review gets googled and clicked hopefully it will knock out the old domain off its pedestal as top of the list. Which I loved being top of the list back when it was mine! Again, another GRRR.
The important part – ALWAYS, always have a screwdriver with you and stay on the side of the door with the screws while installing. You’ll need to test the door here and there, and once and a while there may be a little something off. Sometimes, not often, but sometimes the door can latch just so in the process and may get jammed. You need to be able to take the knob off (with your screwdriver) if the door gets stuck.
District 5 Legislator Forrest Whiterabbit
Karen Leacu LeDuc, Ph.D.
On the bright side, Dennis had a winning record against each military school he faced while coaching The Citadel (11-7 against VMI, 2-1 against Navy, 3-0 against Army, and 1-0 against Air Force). So he had that going for him, which was nice.
So I sold my first Tiger(a 1965) to my friend Victor and bought the new one a 1966 model year sold and titled as a 1967. BRGreen with black seats and trim, white wall tires and a 3.15 rear axle vs the stock one of 2.73. Better off the line but higher rpm on the highway.
After your bird has been carved, place the whole thing and the neck & gizzards in the biggest pot you have, and cover with water. Try to break it up if you can, as that will help most of the nutrients to come out of the bones.
I definitely don't think it's as bad as colic. Don't think we could go that far because he does have times where he seems content. Like when he's sleeping (which is rare) or when he's nursing (which is often). Other than that, no dice on the calm contented baby.
After 3 doses of Benadryl, 1 dose of prednisone and 7 hours in the ER, we were finally able to go home. We have 2 ideas of what could have caused such a significant reaction.
our own anti-stress hero. He discovered his while waiting anxiously before his speech some time ago. A few minutes before his turn on the stage he noticed another speaker looking incredibly relaxed. That was the moment when Alan realized that stress is not a condition, it is a choice. After that day that man became Alan's role model for ease - the person he channels in "could-be-stressful-situations".
Wal-Mart.) ASDA was especially vocal,
The stars are getting quilted with an outline at 1/4" both inside and outside the seam, and then the whole block is stitched diagonally from corner to corner, as well as a straight line through the middle from top to bottom, and left to right. It breaks the star into eight pointed segments, which I really like.
5:50AM. A grey hue.
“Quit complaining and start paying attention to the value the years of experience many of us ‘old folks’ bring to the table. Sometimes we’re actually in the senior positions because we have the experience and knowledge a position such as that requires. Knowledge that doesn’t include something like updating a Web site. We also don’t tend to fear being around people that are smarter or more experienced than we are.”
Those that write purely as an act of catharsis often produce terrible work. I've read far too many plays by people who should really have been having that conversation with the person involved (or a therapist) rather than pretending that it was ever a good subject for drama. But this book, which so clearly serves a double purpose (to conquer the shame instilled by a father who belittled his son from a young age and to conquer an even grander foe: the fear of death), somehow manages to claim its position as a work of art whilst also being an act of confession, a personal memoir and also a piece of fiction, a book hard to categorise and even to enjoy at times but one which despite its meandering makes other books seem spineless afterwards. One that succeeded in helping Knausgaard to deal with his father's death, one can only wonder whether it worked the same magic on his legacy.
Brodie sneezed, and wiped his nose on his arm. As he looked up, he thought he saw movement in the door monitor. He glanced at Mary; her back was to him as she ran cold water in the sink to wash the coon. He hurried silently back to the door and taped the arrow key on the console to turn the camera back to the forest area he thought he saw movement.
Apple is a specific example of a cancer fighting fruit. It contains the plant chemical quercetin that has been shown to significantly reduce the growth of prostate cancer cells and diminish the risk of lung cancer.
And thus we come to close of the first chapter of the novel I’ve been working on for twenty years. So long as you have a very loose definition of ‘working on,’ then yes, I have been ‘working on’ it for the past twenty years! The story spans three novels. It’s all plotted out and I have pages and pages of research, world notes, theme exploration, character notes, notes about things that don’t even happen in the novels; I’m up the wazoo with notes, even though I’m not exactly sure what a wazoo is! Sadly, most of the story itself remains in my head. It’s all up there, it just refuses to spill out onto the page a lot. Fear of failure, lack of confidence. Those demons I guess. I do hope you’re enjoying it.
Happy Monday and happy new week.
An Introduction to A Midsummer Night’s Dream
“Da, Bronislav. Kostya and I are looking out over 12, Plato.”
What ever happened to “find-a-homeless-guy-outside-the-packy-to-buy-beer-for-us” and then drink a 6 pack by a bonfire in the woods? Is this not done anymore by bored teens nationwide?
I wak’d, she fled, and day brought back my night.
tie. Uh oh. It’s getting ready to get tight now. (I talk about illegal soul ties in my first
And I haven't even got to the bit at the end of the talk where Wells explains how to assemble a narrative out of multiple parallel 7-pointers, which is genius but speaks very much for itself.
What a gift.
Prophet Muhammed Sallallahu Alaihi Wasallam) has been addressed as Yaa-Aiyu-Han-Nabi 11 times and has been named as “Ahmed” in Paara 28, Surah Saff, Ayath 6.
Happy Monday y'all! It was a busy weekend at casa HWH, starting and finishing some projects, thinking about what I'm contributing to the Thanksgiving meal, beginning to make my holiday lists (which I'll share with you soon) and pulling out the (yikes!) Christmas decor from the attic. Man am I glad I packed it away so neatly last year:) Now I can easily see what I have and what I need for this year.
15. He was the only man who could get away with playing an entire planet - and a planet that ate robots!
HOW DO I APPLY: For more information and an application form contact Katherine Johnson, k.johnson@asf-uk.org. Participant numbers are limited. Apply before Monday 18th April 2011. Successful applicants will be notified within fourteen days of this.
When we spoke in person about this, my friend told me that the smell of lavender was so strong, she had to open the windows. She keeps no fragrances in her house due to her allergies. Lavender is not only a purple flower, it is also the flower associated with epilepsy awareness, and it came to her on this day, March 26. I believe these incidents of synchronicity, of meaningful coincidence, demonstrate for any who choose to pay attention that there is much more to our being than mere molecules and solar energy. I don’t consider myself a metaphysics expert or a follower of any one particular belief system. I just don’t think the answers that either cold-hearted rationality or traditional religions provide are adequate to capture the true numinosity of the universe.
Maybe running outside taught me something after all.
6. Apply image to a piece of light blue cardstock for a slight blue tint and trim.
How does it work?
A sneaking suspicion has crept up that all the recommendations may not see the light of day. Doubts were cast on the sincerity of the Election Commission to implement the reforms before the general election is announced. Arrogrance has flowed back into the bloodstream of the government which is bouyed by its own readings that it is riding high on the popularity ratings. The boorish conduct of the Speaker in refusing to allow the opposition MPs to have the floor has buttressed the conviction that the government is spoiling for a fight. The public response is Bersih 3.0.
a little over 1/2 a cup of olive oil (or other vegetable oil)
So do I regret it? Not even for a second, this thing is lightning fast and super pretty… but mainly it’s the pretty thing.
"He who dies with the most toys wins" - a phrase current in the 1980s and one not easily forgotten if, like me, you are a lover of simple, uncluttered interiors - though my use of the word "simple" is perhaps a little disingenuous for it is not simplicity per se, but a distaste for the self-consciously artless, the ironically unpolished, the carpingly self-effacing or the profligately vacuous.
* Garnish: fresh oregano
It made me long for the quiet beauty and open skies of Nyaka, where you always feel free to walk and explore. And of course, I miss those sweet kids like crazy.
and we all just fell out laughing! It was great!
Their eyes coming to rest
In the end I finished 6th of 10, where I usually end up O.o
And while Soon-mi is an extreme (the other girls are taller than her), it's still not surprising. The typical North Korean is about six inches shorter than the typical South Korean. (As far as I can tell, Yunu and Guncheol seem average to me, but I am rotten at judging people's relative heights.)
Pulse all ingredients in a blender until they're thoroughly mixed. Add a handful of ice cubes; blend until the drink's cold and frothy. Pour into a tall glass. Garnish with starfruit slice on the rim. Don't wait too long to drink it!
Opposition lawmakers argued the bill would only serve the interests of foreign countries and would not help Turkey in blocking the financial channels of the outlawed Kurdistan Worker’s Party (PKK) abroad.
The venue information is:
Here are three photos of the little squirrel for you to enjoy.
They also held an anti-Bersih riot in the city last July, and caused chaos and showed up their footwear at Lim during a peaceful anti-Lynas gathering in February.
I have entered the below card into lili of the valley( can't remember how to enter link of blog)
These stagnant months I’ve been stuck in that other me’s gaze. Afraid to lose weight to discover that I’m not attractive and afraid to lose weight to discover that I am. Mostly, afraid to lose me. Who is this woman staring back at me? She isn’t the girl I was.
Bulimic Rating: 3/5
"You feel an outsider because you have no family and think you have nothing to offer in return," Horatio said, finishing her sentence as they had been over and over the topic a thousand times. "You've nothing to feel less of Elennara," he tried to reassure her again for the thousandth time. "I understand your feelings, being alone without family ties, orphaned at such an early age. You feel the Fleet is your only home and family, well I am part of the fleet, part of your family. I just want to offer you another part, give you something more than what you have."
White Fell and Other Stories by Clemence Housman and Robert E. Howard: Four off-beat horror stories that see lycanthropes clawing a bloody swath from the frozen wilds of Scandinavia, through the dark forests of central Europe, and to the sun-baked veldt of Africa.
Just a minute for a quick review of Philly.
“The City & the City” by China Mieville - I won this book as a part of the Award Winning Books challenge. It won a Hugo, among other awards.
New rules: While I am also a little afraid about possible changes to the rules (We’ll get to that in a minute), the world just needs some changes once in a while. Even as someone who usually doesn’t give a hoot about the rules, I think it’s cool that a new book will help in mixing things up a bit – at least until the new “undefeatable” lists have been universally agreed upon…
The best part of summer is an early morning spent fishing at the river, guarded by a faithful dog who understands that sitting quietly as you cast out and reel in the line over and over again is its own reward, because when you finally reel in a fish all she’ll get to do is sniff the tailfin before you toss it in the cooler to save for dinner.
Here are some pictures from New River National Park. We had been enjoying the view of the gorge as we drove across the bridge on our way to Pittsburgh, PA. After the bridge, we saw a sign for a park with a scenic view of the river & thought it would be a nice place for a picnic. Once there, we ended up touring the interpretive center & taking a short hike for a better view of the gorge & of the bridge we had just driven across. Riley was especially interested in learning about the gorge bridge history & construction. Maya did the Jr Ranger packet & interviewed the park ranger about her job. Seth was absorbed in an imaginary Transformer battle. :)
It does make sense that the common women are pretty, both in evolutionary terms, and because averages rule out blemishes.
They are India’s largest private sector Newsprint and Printing & Writing Paper manufacturing Company . The Company has its captive power plant and captive water works. Company has technical collaboration with world leaders in the newsprint industry.
What did you think of the expo area this year?
Damn. Foams out of the bottle, then again right out of the glass. Too bad, because it smells like it would be a good IPA.
I feel happy, liberated, excited and to be honest a bit sad too. Endings are always sad.
tall ladder clanging every time
Musicians: Torn Brown - Lead Guitar, Joe Osborn - Bass, Hal Blaine - Drums and Percussion, Larry Knechtel - Piano and Organ, Ron Wells - Rhythm Guitar and Banjo and Nancy (and Ron) Brown, vocals.
My big Russian friend Alex and I have been through a lot together. We've done 100-mile trail runs together, had way too many drinks together (more than a few times), and have gotten up at 5 AM to train on long cold runs (with hangovers), always talking about life and its intricacies.
"Well I don't know," she confessed. "I don't understand. We're going to have an assembly."
Be accountable.
Seldane was an antihistamine on the market in the 1980’s. However, mom thought it was good for EVERYTHING. Very often conversations in my childhood house went like this:
Heat oil in a large nonstick frying pan over medium heat. Add ground cumin and chili powder, stir for a minute until fragrant and sizzling. Add a can of black beans with their liquid and 1/2 cup of water. Stir and mash the beans often, until the beans thicken and crust begins to form on the side and bottom of the pan, about 10 to 15 minutes. As crust forms, scrape the crust and fold it back into the beans. Add water if beans become too dry. Taste and adjust seasoning as needed. Avoid adding salt if you can or salt with caution as most canned beans contain enough salt. Remove from heat.
Your youthful scampers in the spring;
Prior to taking on the incredible journey that is learning to fly, whether it be for private flying or whether the aim is to build a career within aviation, one thing you need to understand is this – exams are a big part of the pilot way of life.
20.) Unintended Nicknames
Shoyoroll - I’m not talking about the “S” with three dots that is embroidered on the sleeves of Shoyoroll gi’s, but the more elaborate crest that appears on their patches and on the skirt of some of their gi’s, such as the Yank. Originally from Guam, Shoyoroll’s Bear Quitugua invokes his origins in many of the company’s designs. The bold script typeface invokes the graffiti aesthetic so fundamental to the brand identity. The circular logo with the company name wrapped around the outer perimeter is a very common design, often seen in hockey and soccer teams. The protruding text and the lightning creates a highly dynamic design.
I have been wrapped up in always trying to do the right thing, being “good” according to the instruction of the church or bible teacher, according to other Jesus followers, or those who are going down that same path, all wrapped up in being perfect. Then if you misstep you are drowned in guilt, shame, and condemnation. Even if it’s a private screw up, beating up on yourself because now you aren’t good enough to be a child of God.
I am not a fan of the classic Ugg boots - I think they're hideous and ugly and shouldn't be worn in public - but how cool are these? The silver fabric actually says "Ugg" all over (not really noticeable unless you take a good look at them), and those are my two little certificates of authenticity.
The path sick sorrow took, the many paths
Black holes continued expanding and contracting in an endless universal dance.
I'll have another post tomorrow about another new product I purchased that is really helping me out! (none beachbody)
with wide rubber sutures? Soon enough, we found ourselves
It's a matchy matchy sickness. So here's the question and be honest. Save me from myself if need be. Should I hide the sky blue helmet except when I'm home alone and can enjoy it's glowing, heart lightening color privately, or is it okay to wear it at the dressage barn occasionally? I think Joan might look askance at it, and I've had even my grey and pearl bead brow band called gaudy, so I think I know the answer :( ...
Oh, hello!
So our main concern is our lighting/nightstand situation. We're obviously not going to live in our basement apartment forever (cross your fingers people) but since we are right now, the way our room is set up doesn't provide too much storage. Because of this, i don't have as much room on my side of the bed for a nightstand because Chris has a larger one with some storage space. If we could both fit something like that, it would obviously be ideal, but since we can't we were just going to stick to the one nightstand for now. But then comes the question, what do we do about lamps?? Chris HATES the idea of wall lamps, which i obviously thought was brilliant! But now i'm questioning my taste...maybe they ARE ugly and my husband has a point. Regardless, i found these swing arm lamps and this tutorial on how to cover up cords that hang down if you're in a temporary living situation like we are. Does anyone have any inspiring ideas??? I need some help here....
Rewards: 2 Anniversary Tokens
This is sick. But we should be getting used to it, because it happens all the time — and nothing is being done to stop it…
Trouble
And Paula at Serendipity gave me the Sisterhood Award. If you go and read her description of me you will not recognize me, but she's nice that way. And her blog design is just gorgeous.
Hot off the press! (Or so it says)…
But, in themselves, these films aren’t evil. Look at how many brilliant films are adaptations: The Godfather trilogy, Schindler’s List, Blade Runner, The Shining, The Green Mile, The Shawshank Redemption, Dr Strangelove, and every goddamn Disney animation that was made for decades. Lots of cult and classic movies are too: The Running Man, Rambo, Death Wish and Total Recall for instance.
So here I am one year later and I now have two blogs. There is this one and I have one for my reading (Nook) which if your interested you can find it here. I will be probably start another one too. One for my Kindle. In my ultimate wisdom I named my first reading blog "Nook" which of course is not going to work for my Kindle. That is like putting Coke on a Pepsi site.
But while these can hog the limelight for now, I am more interested in the ones that got rejected.
With the 2012 NBA Playoffs set to begin today, it’s obvious that things are about to heat up in arenas across the league. But it’s getting hot inside Panini America HQ right about now, too.
Don't get me wrong, I'll squeeze my swollen sausage-y self into those maternity pants if I have to, but I'm not going to like it, and I'm not going to be comfortable. Good thing those sweet babies are worth every single second of it all!
So, I am used to splinters, scratches and cuts.
Me- Scratch, stop, step back, stand, and wait.
It's amazing how quickly this stage sets in. Literally seconds after reading those rejections, these thoughts started forming. And I guess, in a way, that's everyone's initial reaction to bad news. The instinct to rub your eyes, pinch yourself, and convince yourself that it's just a bad dream. It kind of felt like floating in a bubble of blissful, willful ignorance.
I wonder if you and I would wake ourselves out of our relaxed spiritual lives, could we focus better on what is really important. My God is Calling. In Song of Solomon 5 there is a sad account of our Beloved calling and waiting yet He was unattended at the time of His call. You and I can NOT let our temporary lives drown out the One who has given us an eternal life. We won't spend eternity remembering the casserole recipes we made, or the day out with the girls, or the soccer games, swim meets, movie nights, Facebook, Kindles or sleep. No, if you are saved, you are going to spend it with God. Up close, and personal. What do you even know about Him? Are you investing in your eternity? Are you investing in someone else's eternity? I hope so. My God is calling. He is standing there wanting you to know Him. He chose US to die for. We are His inheritance that He has paid the highest price for and He wants ALL of us, not just our left over time. My God is Calling.
- Here’s what i’ve learned,
I was in a creative slump the last few days. I got home on Friday and wanted to create so badly...but, nothing. Saturday I got up wanting to create all day, and nothing! Grrrrr, don't you just hate when you have the time and desire to create and you can't even get started? I printed this super adorable digi, named Carrington, and started by coloring her hair on Saturday. I hated how it turned out and still do. I got up today and colored in a House Mouse stamp that I was given as a gift, but never used...and hated it. So I just kept staring at this image...wondering if I could just start coloring the rest of her and salvage it. I hate, hate, hate coloring something and not using it. I feel like I am wasting Copic ink..lol Anyone else ever feel like that? Anyway, I fired up my Spotify and started jamming out to some tunes.. and got lost in coloring while I sang along to some old favorites. The next thing I know, I have a colored image and some juices are flowing! You have no idea how super excited and proud of myself I was for getting this card completed..lol I felt like it was a huge accomplishment since my mojo seemed to have packed up and went North.
Lee Hyukjae
Queen Tiy was particularly fond of lilies and had her rooms at the palace arranged with hundreds and hundreds of lilies each day. But it was the scent of the lotus flower, namely the blue lotus that became the pervading scent of Egypt. The perfume of the open flower is like that of hyacinth. To adorn oneself with a lotus was to declare one’s intentions in love.
understanding
Ray Halbritter, CEO of Oneida Nation Enterprises, has helped put together a cast of celebrities, among others, to serve the meals to New York's homeless. The group includes: Comedian, Mario Cantone; Actors Jill Flint, Giles Marini, Amy Carlson, Levin Rambin, and Jesse Metcalfe; Evan Lysacek, Champion Figure Skater; Tomas Jones, Kansas City Chiefs; and Justin Tuck, New York Giants.
1/2 tea baking soda
There’s still ice on many of the branches and I’m wondering if we’ll have a 2-hour delay tomorrow. Either way, I’ll be hiking down the driveway in the morning and meeting a co-worker who lives in the development through the woods.
The MPI is a composite measure of construction in three key elements of the multifamily housing market: low-rent apartments, market-rate rental apartments and “for-sale” units, or condominiums. The index and all of its components are scaled so that any number over 50 indicates that more respondents report conditions are improving than report conditions are getting worse. In the third quarter of 2011, the MPI component tracking builder and developer perceptions of market-rate rental properties recorded an all-time high of 63.8, while low-rent units remained steady at 50.1. For-sale units rose to 31.9, the highest recording since the second quarter of 2006.
Here's what the second week of math looked like in my classroom:
Other studies have been performed on population data from World War II. In Norway during the war, the death rate from heart disease and strokes dropped significantly at the same time that the consumption of meat dropped.
Consensus: The comedy and touching moments are there enough to put a grin on your face, but Father of the Bride has so much schmaltz, cheesy lines, and forced moments of emotion that it sort of takes away from all the pleasant moments this film has. However, Steve Martin among others is still game and pull it off very well.
In the early part of 2012, I visited the Yorkshire Sculpture Park. It was my first visit so I was unsure about what I would make of it. I was relieved to find there was a few pieces of art that took my interest.
In this post, I will try to highlight the flaws in the Indian legal framework. while drawing from the Second Circuit ruling in the Youtube-Viacom case, which was delivered only a few days ago.
9) Recognize and thank both donors and campaign volunteers for participating in the campaign.
Here are some of my own favourites from her onscreen wardrobe during the 1950s, starting with a selection from Rear Window (1954), the Alfred Hitchcock thriller which acknowledged the growing fascination with Kelly’s style by casting her as a young woman who works in the fashion industry.
it's NOT just wedding dresses - they have gowns, shoes, jewelry, cover-ups, hair adornments, and accessories! - below are a few of my favorites!
I used to fairly regularly hire 120 foot platforms. Currently the world's biggest platform lifters are built by Bronto Skylift in Finland, and can extent to 104 metres 341ft above the ground..
Dual colour camera sees dolphins on a dark night, lit only by their bioluminescent wakes
I like baked goods.
Best Promotion for Redemption
Scientific, political, and public support for the theory of man-made global warming is collapsing. Most scientists and 60 percent of the general public (in the U.S.) do not believe man-made global warming is a problem.
Now to enjoy this lovely spring day.
*Kevin Henkes
I have to say the turnout wasn’t exactly pleasing, but the little crowd that was there was really interactive and I bet they all had a great night.
The Arbor by Clio Barnard, is the extraordinary story of British playwright Andrea Dunbar. Dunbar grew up in a miserable housing estate/project in West Yorkshire, and somehow developed an uncanny gift for taking her family’s and neighbors’ conversations and transforming them into a comment on family dysfunction, racism, and poverty. At the age of 15 she won a playwriting contest for her play The Arbor (written by hand, in green ink, as the director remembers), a play so impressive it was performed at London’s Royal Court Theatre and later in New York. After writing two more plays and producing a film, and bearing three children by three different men, she died at age 29 after a young adulthood she dedicated to alcohol in the same way her father had before her.
1. The J.P. Ryan Jacket pattern. I've made this pattern so many times I've lost count. I've altered it to make late period jackets like a peirrot, I've made long sleeves, short sleeves, sleeves with cuffs and sleeves with flounces. I've made plain versions out of linen and fancy embroidered silk ones.
The police go on to say most of these illegal immigrants "may belong to the economically-active age group, as well as the high crime-risk age group".
I can see that interpretation, and even sympathize with it, but I don't accept it. It may be that I do not want to accept it, that I'm reading into Innocence a certain perspective because I am uncomfortable with a world where children's bodies are fetishized and sexualized so thoroughly. A perspective such as Dargis's seems to me hyper-aware of the fetishization -- it seems to be in cahoots with the gaze of the adults in the mysterious audience of the ballets. Her mention of Gaspar Noé is notable as well, and is one that often comes up in the negative reviews of the film: because Hadzihalilovic has collaborated with Noé, been a producer for him, is married to him, and dedicated Innocence to him, therefore her interest in filming the children must contain provocative, and specifically sexual, motives.
He helped me out of my violent red Yaris, and I chased him down the street swinging the remains of the steering wheel, still in my clutches.
Maybe in a hundred years’ time, when everyone forgets what the fax machine was, someone can pull that trick on our great-granchildren.
The idealized structure of pure gypsum consists of lattice planes of calcium sulfate molecules weakly bonded to alternating layers of water. The bond is an ionic one between the oxygen atoms and the hydrogen atoms in water – very easily broken. Water thus weakly bonded is often called the water of crystallization. As gypsum is heated, the water is diffused out of the matrix, and the plaster converts to calcium sulfate hemihydrate: CaSO4 + ½ H2O. (Obviously, there is not half a molecule of water, one water molecule is shared by two calcium sulfate molecules). This conversion is completed at 177C (350F). This is step 1.
To see your work in print. To share what you created. To encourage others to be creative. To find and connect with other people who have similar interests. To get mail. To make new friends. To create the publication you always wished existed. To share information. To educate. To change people’s minds. To teach yourself something new. To get something off your chest. To make yourself a better writer or artist. The reasons for publishing a zine are as diverse and unique as the individuals who create zines.
So for a Nigerian stew – which means what? You need:
The use of tools, and the carrying of the tools for the ‘just in case’ scenario indicate that these little cephalopods are much smarter than we give them credit for. Whether they are really psychic or not is still not resolved.
Take a listen. It should be up in iTunes shortly. If you are impatient you can just listen below!
unlike her other life of constant motion
Just Paint it!
Total word-count: 100 words.
See it's not that hard. Remember first cut is the hardest but after that you'll be proud of yourself. Now I can't wait to see what you'll come up with! BTW-I know this isn't really a challenge for Ingrid who already does amazing things with her patterned paper and seems to have no problem using it. Just please have mercy on the rest of us.
Wooo, "Shark Week" starts tonight!!! I never get tired of watching Shark Week :) I've probably been watching it for at least the past 10 years now. Can you believe that this will be the 24th annual Shark Week? I always make sure I see each of the episodes - they're all so entertaining and interesting to me. I'm a lover of all animals, but I'm a huge fan of marine life, and sharks are definitely a favorite of mine. My favorite species of sharks include bull, mako, hammerhead, tiger, and of course, great white ;)
make the world around them better.
Yesterday morning I thought of an interesting (and easy) pattern for machine-quilting it so I carefully pinned and basted it and got stuck into sewing it.
I want to say a big "Thank You" to those who have been signing up to follow my brand spanking new Teachers pay Teachers store. I appreciate it sooo much. :) I am in the process of getting some things on there both paid and free.
Shape the dough into a ball, and then place it in a lightly greased bowl. Let rise about 45 minutes. Preheat the oven to 350 degrees.
1 cup oatmeal, 1/2 cup peanut butter (or other nut butter), 1/3 cup honey 1 cup coconut flakes, 1/2 cup ground flaxseed, 1/2 cup mini chocolate chips, 1 tsp vanilla Mix everything above in a medium bowl until thoroughly incorporated. Let chill in the refrigerator for half an hour. Once chilled, roll into balls and enjoy! Store in an airtight container and keep refrigerated for up to 1 week.
scraps of paper from my scrap stash of coral, lime and blue (mixture of manufactures)
But in many cases, borrowers have second mortgages, tax or homeowners’ association liens, or mortgage insurance on the property, which make short sales difficult and time consuming to negotiate.
Run 4 miles 3 times this week – 10
Leah requested we flip it around, and have the deep square-cut neck in the front. Any knitter with some experience can alter patterns to suit their own needs, thus using the pattern more as a template than an exact blueprint. One of the nice things about Wendy’s book is that she anticipates this, and gives lots of suggestions for ways to alter the patterns, as well as encouragement to knitters who haven’t done much in the way of alterations.
Lust has taken plant in it
- 8-10 slices firm or extra firm tofu
If the editor gives you a house style to work to, follow it. If not, use a sensible and fairly plain format. It's your writing the editor is interested in, not your skill in making fancy Word documents. (In fact, making fancy Word documents is skill that has no market value whatsoever - designers work in Quark or InDesign, and no one makes a 'real' document in Word.) Making things look fancy is the designer's job - you're not the designer. The publisher has a designer. What it doesn't have is someone who can write decent copy. Do your job, and do it properly - leave other people's jobs for them to do!
Loud and Annoying Mike Belgrave
* You have more recordings of EVP than you do of your favorite music.
Is there further proof needed to show that the suggested and feared anomaly and impropriety of the Legislature and the Executive both exercising legislative functions simultaneously, is more fancied than real? The situation was contemplated and expressly intended by the Legislature itself, evidently believing that said condition or state of affairs was neither anomalous nor improper. There is to my mind really no incompatibility. At such a time and during the period of their simultaneous functioning, the Legislature may perform its ordinary legislative duties taking its time to study, consider, amend and pass bills, reserving to the President matters requiring and demanding immediate action.
Son, Bo Guagua — Graduate student at Harvard’s Kennedy School of Government.
11) Found my way to the new Goodwill Bookstore and found three fantastic cook books! Talk about Good II The book of Cajun Cuisine. The County Fair Cookbook and a James Beard recipes for the Cuisinart. Any James Beard cookbook is a treasure. Score!
08. Lady
Critics called her “the Mary Garden of Ragtime”, a point of reference that is completely meaningless today (as if I had to tell you).
Ellie’s Haven by Sharlene MacLaren
I spent a large part of tonight on the bog, due to a dodgy fish curry I had eaten the night before. But even diarrhoea doesn't put me off my quest to find interesting German beer. A Störtebeker Pils and Pinkus Weissbier should be just the tonic...
Dec 28 Colas-Saal Ascahffenburg, Germany
Anyway, enough medical stuff--back to the Drummer story. He actually responded Tuesday night to my Tuesday afternoon email. His email was a few short paragraphs, chatting more briefly than usual, but saying yes to joining me for the potluck dinner next door (yay!). He closed with "Have a great evening, and see you on Saturday! You're quite stunning, by the way. :-)"
Well, build a home for an African family and you can do some good. Not a good they couldn't have done for themselves, mind, but that's not the point is it?
If you want to be loved by everyone, you have to stay mainstream. But in my eyes that’s entertainment and not art. And there are even people who don’t like mainstream, like me. I hope that you dare to make a choice for being outspoken, showing yourself and your message to others. And that you will keep creating, even if you know that not everyone will like you and your message. You create for the people who like it, not for the people who don’t.
Jordan enjoying Jennifer's Birthday cake
Oh. My. God. Reading this, I am once again reminded of why I love Maggie Stiefvater's writing so much. Simply magical, really. The way she phrases her words, the detailed description of the settings, the characters. It makes me feel as if her stories come truly alive.
In the faint moonlight, the grass is singing
NEXT MOVIE: Ever After: A Cinderella Story (1998)
This afternoon I reread the short play (playlet really) called Sir Charles Grandison, which has become a site of mild controversy. A diplomatic transcript of the ms has been published by Southam in a now famous edition (it gave rise to a Merchant/Irovy/Jhabvala movie, Jane Austen in Manhattan) and in an Italian edition by Beatrice Battaglia.
What familiar apparition?
I just wanted to thank you. I first found you and read your posts about running about 3 years ago, when my youngest child was 6 months old. I started running about 2.5 years ago, very slowly, thank you! And I’ve kept it up, increasing speed and distance, and ran my first half marathon last weekend. Thank you so much! I started (~44!) just because it was quick – I could leave the house for just half an hour, and get in a good workout. But I’ve grown to appreciate the space it provides me, as well as the sense of accomplishment I have afterwards. I have a running partner as well, and she has become a good friend – another perk. – Michelle
COSTUME DESIGN
Other: Corner rounder, Square punch (to make banner ends), Dimensional foam
Riddle Question: Why did the cookie go to the doctor?
There are several cases where a person can undergo plastic surgery. This operation is requires utmost care as it may the result could be unfavorable to patient. Anesthesia with sedation is what’s commonly used by surgeon for plastic surgery. However, using this type of operation caused various adverse effects. With this, a study was conducted that which proves the effectiveness of Hypnotherapy for this operation to lower the levels of required sedation. Below is an example research conducted during an action plastic surgery operation.
They have still not had any formula. They are doing wonderfully nursing- much better than I ever thought we would do. I have been pumping two times during the day at work and feeding them as soon as I get home. Still eating on schedule every three hours. I am thinking they eat about 4-5 ounces each time, because that is what satisfies them when I pump and give them bottles. Everyday that we make it nursing I feel like it is a small victory.
Spread batter in a 10" or 12" round spring form pan that has been sprayed with non-stick cooking spray.
My tongue down the thick shaft of his veins
Of my two sons, both asleep,
Description Of The Topics Below:Twilight, Twilight portrait, soft Snap, landscape, Beach, snow, Fireworks, candle of the high-speed shutter, magnifying glass
I laughed. Then I realized he was serious when he started walking closer to me with a sheepish grin on his face. In truth, till then I had no idea I could run that fast- I thanked the fast food I had just had for lunch. I need not tell you that I quit smoking for the third time this year that day.
The "proef" is in the tasting (literally in Dutch), so together with the brewing equipment they bring their "big brews" for tasting sessions. These beers are the result of successful recipes that they let commercial brewers produce under licence. These give a small contribution towards some of the costs involved in this hobby. Or, as the hobby brewers say, you can support an association by buying a membership card or in this case by drinking a beer. An easy choice in my (and their) opinion.
For breakfast we ordered our self some in-room service!!!
Sarkozy and German Chancellor Angela Merkel agreed on a common policy of budget cuts and partial “reform” — a euphemism for “dismantling” — of the welfare state. This, they decided, was the way to return Europe to prosperity and save the European Union’s common currency, the euro, from collapse.
Then we took our first trip to Whole Foods Market. We even got my parents to watch the kids, so we could go and really figure that place out. It is amazing. We were surprised that we were paying very similar prices to our Kroger, but we were buying all organic. The biggest difference in price from Kroger were the eggs. For example, at Kroger we bought regular ole eggs for about $1 while at WFM we spent about $3 for cage-free, local eggs. However, chicken was the same price at Kroger and WFM, cereal was the same, etc. Probably our biggest expense was switching over to new sauces and dressings and such.
I had a moment. That person may have thought it wasn't a pretty moment. I politely looked at her and said, "Oh, I am smart! I have a bachelor's degree from Texas A&M and have worked in social services since I graduated." I wanted to tell that person that I am more qualified to do her job than she is, but I refrained. My momma taught me better than that. Apparently her momma didn't teach her the same manners.
There is no doubt that buildings, particularly religious buildings, can have quite a hold on us. That was equally true for the Jews. They had every reason to be attached to their temple because of its history. As God’s chosen people, they had the privilege of having God dwell with them. In the time of Moses the tabernacle was built to God’s specifications. On the first day of the first month in the second year of the Exodus the tabernacle was set up with the ark of the covenant within it and all its furnishings in place. Moses offered incense on the golden altar; he offered the burnt offering and grain offering; he and Aaron washed their hands and feet as God had commanded. When all was done according to God’s commandments, a cloud covered the tent of meeting and God’s glory filled the tabernacle.
Most people
The programme cited a particular trip on January 26, 2009. Blair was in the country in his official capacity as “peace envoy”. Accompanying him, however, was Jonathan Powell, Blair’s private secretary at the time of the Iraq war, and now senior adviser to TBA. Shortly afterwards, TBA won a contract with the Kuwaiti regime to produce a “review” of its economy, rumoured to be worth £27 million.
In short, peremptory instructions from Blogger, accompanied by a threat of deletion of the entire blog if we fail to comply – little short of eight year's work – without proper explanation, and without being able to make contact with "the team", is not something we can live with.
to simply Be.
allegation
then, a coda of silence so pure it aches.
Ok, I made that up.
I noticed this morning that I have a bunch of outfit shots that I haven't posted yet so here is a quick up of some of my outfits for this week.
The morning after the night’s darkness
Kade: You know what's amazing?
I am slightly feeling the draw toward Manhattan (though I actually I enjoyed the feel of Brooklyn a bit more, as my friend said it’s like a laidback Manhattan, but commuting from there would be more of a hassle). For the year I’m content to be here. I enjoy being in walking distance of Fordham (my school), the Bronx Zoo and the Botanical Gardens. I imagine during the school year I’ll work late in the large and gorgeous library on my campus. I’m never quite as productive home. Plus I have no desk here and studying in my bed is impossible. I love dreaming too much to stop myself from napping in it.
Solicit feedback, concerns, and ideas from everyone. The IT guys…the writers…the lawyers…the marketers…everyone will have a completely different perspective on the process. Gather as much information as possible and incorporate the good ideas into the new process. People will accept the change more readily if they have input into the process.
It seems that humans should be the protectors of animal species that share our planet, especially those at risk of becoming extinct. Yet, once again, not enough steps were taken, support given, or will to protect it existed….
08 War (con Carajo)
Here is a close-up.
Borders: Two unknown and Melissa Francis
Our mission is to reach the hurting, the hopeless, the lost, the suicidal and the depressed with the life transforming hope and leadership offered to us in Christ.
To sum it up, BPD is severe emotional immaturity that can be felt by the individual and perceived by others. It’s a painful experience and everyday is a struggle. For too many years, the diagnosis was ignored. Ironic. There’s been a surge of new research and development on special behavioral therapies to help those cope with BPD. To learn more about BPD take a look at my section on helpful links.
“Surprised and disappointed”!
"Gary, I was going around and around in my head for a quote, but I like that one. 'Would you strip naked and wear peanut butter for just any group of friends?' That sounds like something I'd say... well, the peanut butter part, anyway. Speaking of, I am almost out of PB. The world is about to stop turning, get ready. "
Somewhere in all of that I’d trailed to a halt, eyes wide and mouth gaping, frozen halfway through a step. I wiped my mouth on the back of my sleeve and quit the zombie impersonation. “What the hell?” I said. “You understood that?”
My first memory of a library is the Parmly Billings Library in Billings, Montana. The city was named for Northern Pacific Railroad president Frederick Billings, whose son Parmly was the only family member to live there. When Parmly died of pneumonia at 25 in 1888, his parents gave the city a building site and seed money for a library. Built of local sandstone in the Romanesque style, it served as the library from 1901 until the late 1960s. I thought it was a castle.
“When we are on automatic pilot, trying to get someplace else all the time without being attentive to where we already are, we can leave a wake of disaster behind us in terms of our own health and well-being, because we’re not listening to the body. We’re not paying attention to its messages; we’re not even in our bodies much of the time,” explains Kabat-Zinn. “Mindfulness—paying attention on purpose in the present moment nonjudgmentally—immediately restores us to our wholeness, to that right inward measure that’s at the root of both meditation and medicine.”
The Comfort Recline™ seat gives you a choice of two positions, and WhisperQuiet™ operation makes this swing silent in use. Wrap it all up in the super-fun animal decor and you've got a perfect travel companion. Part of Bright Starts™’ Sunnyside Safari™ Collection. Start the fun with Bright Starts!™
The Komodo can only hear sounds between 200 and 4000 Hertz, but can see as far as 980 feet away. Except it can’t see stationary objects very well and it cannot see at night since it has no cones in its eyes. Even so, the Komodo can detect a carrion (deer) from 2.5-5.9 miles away. Wow! Can the big cats and bears say the same? I’ll have to look up how far away they can detect prey. . .
There are goblins that haunt the old synagogue at the top of the hill and they are quite the nuisance! They blow out the candles on the menorah; they throw potato latkes on the floor and basically make it impossible for the village people to celebrate Chanukah. In this delightfully original Chanukah tale, you just can’t help but giggle as Hershel of Ostropol outwits those nasty goblins and rids the village people of them once and for all. This book is a pleasure to read! My kids truly enjoyed it, all while learning a few things about Chanukah!3. A Baby Born in Bethlehem
Clean the bilge.Way down there is some pretty nasty gook that I don’t want to run through the el. bilge pump. I read somewhere that diapers
And a quick "happy birthday" to my uncle Len! I hope you have a great day - you are such a wonderful uncle to me and to Grace and Abby!
On the right, the lesson plans I keep in my head exploded across the page until I ran out of room. Drawing is not my forte, but for some reason I was inspired to sketch a little picture for each time period. I have to say I’m a little proud of the doodles I did of the Colosseum and the boat for the Age of Exploration. Creativity truly does strike in the strangest of places and often asks us to do things we’d normally approach with reluctance. This page reminded me my muse has the best of intentions and it’s up to me to make sure I’m open and ready to follow her wherever she leads. Otherwise, I’ll never know the magic of a creative moment.
healing is found.
2) a drawing – (a simple picture usually made with a pencil)
The FMLN currently has 35 of the AL’s 84 seats. Its principal rival, the far-right Alianza Republicana Nacionalista (ARENA), has just 19. Recent polls, however, suggest that ARENA could close the gap – and maybe even outpoll the FMLN – in El Salvador’s upcoming legislative and municipal elections, which are set to take place March 11.
Making compost is not rocket science but you do need to watch your green to brown ratio. The truth is, if you threw all the above into a heap in your backyard, it would eventually rot down, no matter what you did and you'd have compost. But we are actively working to increase the fertility of our gardens, so we want compost and we want it NOW. What ever you can do to speed up the process, do it. Turning the compost helps speed it up, so turn it over with a fork about once a week.
The writing was “brilly,” as the characters would say. I really liked the alternating chapters between Elder and Amy. At points, it really helped keep up the suspense — Revis would leave me hanging at the end of an Elder chapter, all through an Amy chapter, which would also leave me hanging, and the cycle would continue. Do you see how I couldn’t put it down? And the mystery part of it was definitely a mystery — I couldn’t guess what the outcome was going to be! And there are plenty of questions left for the next book, even if this one wraps up nicely if this was the only one read in the series (that’s actually a huge plus for me, even though I do intend on reading the next one A.S.A.P.!)
This is 2 coats of OPI-What's With The Cattitude, and one swipe of China Glaze-First Mate. The white stripes are done with a white nail art polish.
analyze my thoughts, find patterns, summarize,
“Ugly hot” are those people that you still find attractive, despite the fact that you would be extremely embarrassed if your friend’s found out you fucked them…. That is, until your friends actually meet them and realise just how “ugly hot” they are! I do think it’s okay to indulge in the occasional ugly hottie. If you’re not blessed with beautifulness, there is still hope for you!! Act like you’re hot shit and that you don’t give a fuck and you have all the confidence in the world – you will get bitches naked!
'Cos it was his daddy's bank that we robbed
~Marilyn, TFF
The other woman that my wife wanted me to visit was my MOTHER, who has been
This is the kind of blog post I make so I can find the dates later.
I was pretty skeptical when I pulled the "crust" out of the oven, and I was a bit worried because my universal dinner back-up plan of Little Ceasar's pizza wouldn't work with no carbs. But I forged ahead praying and crossing my fingers it would at least be edible. And you know what? It was actually pretty awesome. Boy #2 wasn't sure about the crust at first and just ate the toppings, but once the husband told him it was cheese and eggs, he was completely on board with it. There was none of this left by the time dinner was done. The husband said he'd even eat it when we were doing no carbs! I used turkey pepperoni as the only topping. It didn't even occur to me to put anything else on it, but I think next time I'd add some veggies or a second meat to make it slightly more filling. this will definitely grace our table again!
The Holstein tries to dodge around Tadd Pohl, the frog, to get at my thrower, but trips on the long frog legs!
I have been neglectful, I will admit that right up front. The last week has been chock full of stuff, including a boyfriend visit over the weekend. I shall now attempt to fill in the blanks. This morning turned out to be an interesting trip. I went into town for routine blood tests, then stopped in at my local favorite home improvement store. While there, I decided to look for one thing that wasn’t on my list. A pool floatie. Last year’s model had died, and I wanted another one like it. But when I went to the aisle with the pool stuff, outside, it was blocked off. I had to go up front to locate a store person, who then looked to verify there was no apparent reason for the blockade and then called to make sure they were done. Well, they weren’t. And they also weren’t moving heavy equipment around, at least not for normal store purposes. As it turned out, a baby owl had fallen to the ground. There are a couple of barn owls who live there, which I hadn’t known before, and their new little baby had fallen out. Eventually, after giving them time to finish up, I found out that there had been 3 babies. Only one survived, and it has been replaced in the ‘nest’. Then they fortified things, so that wouldn’t happen again. I finally was able to go into that aisle, where I met up with the guy who was fixing things for the owls. He pointed out the mama owl, who was directly above the pool stuff I wanted to look at. Dad was farther away, watching over the newly replaced baby in the nest. Gosh, they’re beautiful creatures! And I was left with a feeling of awe for these lovely birds, who are pleasantly accepted by the store employees. The owls do their part and keep the rodent population down, so get fed whilst doing chores. A working bird, a happy partnership. Just hope the baby makes it.
I had a lot to say about your marriage, but even I once in a while feel the need to show mercy. *chuckle* Fact is that this step catapulted you right into the “center of general sympathy”. How poor does some “It-Girl” have to be to do something like this? I’m afraid this is a question only you might be able to answer… (And maybe I could too, but I promised to be merciful today.)
That’s okay, sort of, since we’ve enjoyed our home for a fair number of years now. But to rent the place out, we will have to finish the painting in the basement.
Royalties are paid a month to two months after the fact. Factoring in that as well as putting in the order, receiving them, and getting them ready, I will be delivering the Kindle Fires to the hospital in June of 2012.
Of course He will. He is God with us.
One of my new friends from my, as Pup loves to call it, gristly little job, is Alli-baby. A gorgeous, vivacious, 40 year-old woman who is CHUCK full of ideas, sass, and exploding laughter.
Level 2: MP Cost: 29, Duration: 20 seconds.
The world bent. Snapped back.
After some genius fucking posting, I started to feel under pressure to carry on with the high standard of bile I'd created. Then I started to resent the fucking thing. I also realised that I spent far too much of my fucking time visiting, reading, commenting and writing blogs, to the detriment of my real life.
O_o
It wasn't the first time I'd done voluntary work. I spent one day a week for a year while I was at University, helping in the classroom of a special school. I'd done numerous activities to raise money for charities. When I was a teenager, I spent Sunday afternoons visiting an old people's home for a while. I helped serve dinners, made beds, emptied bed pans, chatted with the oldies. Maybe a strange thing to do as a teenager.
My office returned $33,187,774 in 2011, blowing past the 2010 record of $32,836,258. With a little more than 2 weeks left in the year, the State Treasury could return more than $33.5 million.
If you do dare to order one, you’ll need four (very hungry) people to consume it in one sitting. Otherwise, you’re bringing extra sandwiches home. Which we did.
I like having completed this project. I learned how to scale the images across a timeline. Doing so was difficult at first for I found that scaling the images and timing the footage so that it coincides with the timing of the music was tricky.
I woke up with a smile
If we claim to be followers of Jesus Christ, then we also proclaim our commitment to being on mission with Him. As Jesus came to bring the Father glory, so we also are His ambassadors who reflect this same passion and desire. As parents, we also have the responsibility of raising up another generation of Jesus followers – arrows to be sent out by God in response to His call and mission. It is to this end that Julie Ferwerda writes to us in One Million Arrows.
So next day comes (Thursday) and they discovered a crack above the fireplace, so filled it, let it dry, sanded it, it re-appeared...........5 fillings and sanding later it was decided to let it dry overnight.
“Go Your Own Way”
Well, I also made a special Christmas gift for Lana's teacher on Friday, because it was the last day of school before the Winter vacation. I made her Grapefruit Bath salts with vitamin E. It smelled so yummy...
9) Mama
3) what is your stripper name? (take the name of your first pet and the name of the street you grew up on)
To answer a name means that you agree to, confess and endorse the meaning and import of that name in your life. That’s why you ought to answer only names that are consistent with God’s purpose for you; names that glorify God’s Word and are consistent with your identity and position as a new creation in Christ Jesus.
Greg Walton: “I’m a Junior in Madison.”
"Let's not," she agreed. "I know a warm bed that waits."
I would say, that is the way the world works. If you see that in my books then you see something that is not there.
Halley himself might have been “Hawley” as in “haul”. The next
Recently I came across a recipe for a sandwich that is now been deemed my new absolute FAVORITE sandwich. I found it on pinterest and was practically drooling at my computer screen and couldn't wait to try it. I even had all the ingredients on hand at the time..I love it when that happens!!! Below is a picture of the one I made...doesn't it look delicious!!!
We know of many triggers for cancer in certain susceptible people. Hormone replacement therapy (HRT) increases a person’s chance of getting cancer on a hormone receptor site. However, some people that take these drugs get cancer while others do not. Why is that? What is a common antecedent to cancer formation?
I thought since I had the right pan this time, that everything would go smoothly. But since the pan was so large, I found myself extending the baking time over and over again so that the middle of the cake could finish baking. When the middle was finally done and the cakes came out of the oven, I could already see that the edges of the cake were overdone, and even looked crispy! So after the cakes had cooled, I sliced off about half an inch of cake from each of the edges.
Anyway. Laundry is calling. I just wanted to try to put my thoughts into words. If I confused you, my apologies. Bear with this happy/busy/tired/content Mama. ;)
Unfortunately, it's not built yet. I've run into some hardware issues and need to pick up some additional materials. This would be the reason for a lack of pictures and directions to what I did, both of which will follow upon completion. Until then, the MLT is just a cooler with a hole in it.
Her perfume crept to him like a snake. Just a flicker at first then suddenly he was wrapped in it, indeed constricted by it almost. Her scent cleared away the odor of the bar, cigarettes, booze and time, and demanded its own audience with his now pounding heart. She opened her mouth as if to speak, then gently bit her lower lip in a change of direction. She rocked left to right just a bit and rolled her glass so that the ice clicked again, her head still dropped just to the point where he could see only her mouth below the lacy veil. When she released her lip, it stuck to one tooth for just an instant, then flushed full and red again. She was waiting for him to speak to her. Waiting for him to say the right thing to a woman whose face he had never seen, whose eyes had never met his. She knew she had him, probably had for a while, and was waiting to see if she would take him.
Young Zygons were called hatchlings and were slimy and pale with shorter limbs. Hatchlings were mute, but much faster than adults.
If I owned a company and you worked for me, and you did something bad to an innocent third party, I'd have to take some responsibility whether I knew about it or not.
Oh, Lord, please don't let me be misunderstood.
with my mom's birthday coming up at the end of this week, i thought i'd take the opportunity to feature some of our great snarky & sassy letterpress birthday cards from fin+roe.
No Body by The Tombstones
Linens
Moon could hear Stella's heartbeat...
Are joining the festival at Bath
Others open you by means of love – by choosing to love you, by acting lovingly towards you, always keeping your wellbeing as their highest intention they gain your trust and so you feel safe to open. They’re like the sun gently warming you, until you are so soft and relaxed there are no defenses, no egg-shell left. You stand clothed only in love.
The photographer isn't - still trying to get some obligations out of the way.
Mentors. My sister's Ninjitsu instructor and drum teacher are both most definitely mentors. They're people she's friends with, people she respects, and people she learns a lot from (and as in all healthy relationships, no matter the type, I imagine they learn from her, as well). Mentors can be found through formal things like classes, as well as informally, through your community or extended social network. But no matter how you find them, people who are passionate and knowledgeable about something (be they accredited teachers or not), and are happy to share that knowledge and experience with others, can be a really wonderful way to learn.
(one of the newest additions to my collection)
Size: 23,110 acres
I am reminded (by Radio 2 mainly) that I neglected to mention the centenary on Tuesday last week of the magnificent maestro of cha-cha-cha kitsch Edmundo Ros OBE!
And with his only kiss as cool as you all please
Christianity is the story of how God gets to us.
I saw two pigs
GEORGE TOWN: Prime Minister Najib Tun Razak has let slip the opportunity to engage and accommodate fence-sitters who want good governance and reforms in the system.
Sorry it's not like I'm the queen of the gods or something
Cardiacs- Leader of the Starry Skies
^Janie forgot to nag me!
Forced to see all of the beauty around.
My Friend Donelda is hosting a Weekly Christmas card challenge on SCS so that we can make some Christmas cards in advance and not scramble around at the end of the year. It has been made fun by having a different challenge each week. Jan20th weekend challenge - provided by Donelda was to create a Christmas card using a tree/branch/bush/or leaf. I used PTI's Winterberry stamp set for my card.
But wait! There's more!
When we were planning her party I told her she could only invite 8 friends. We have a small house, and not a huge budget. So she picked her 8 friends (and a handful of adults that she wanted to have here to help out *LOL*).
14. Chopped cilantro, 1 tablespoon.
Here’s how it works: First, a parent corporation in the United States (like Google) sets up a small corporate subsidiary in Ireland—let’s call it “S1.” The parent then enters into a legal agreement that gives the European rights to all of its “intangible” products—like, say, an Internet search algorithm—to S1. In return, S1 agrees to help market or promote those products in some way within Europe. By virtue of this arrangement, all of the parent’s European income from the products would be collected by S1.
Once you start making compost, you'll look at your household waste in a different way. Many things that were once alive, like paper, cardboard, cotton and linen fabric, hair, tea leaves etc, can be used to make compost. Instead of being waste, they'll now be a resource to make the best fertiliser around. So start your search today. If you're decluttering, bingo! You can use all those old papers, magazines and worn out skirts in your compost heap. Set up a little compost collection bucket in your kitchen for the kitchen waste you want to put into the compost. It's best if this has a lid if you want to empty it once a day.
Note the following paragraph:
OK, let's see what the rest of the Sweet Sunday Sketch Team has in store for us this week:
And it goes on, telling the story of what happened on September 11, 2001. Something peculiar, though. No mention is made of the ideology of the terrorists. The words Islam, Jihad, Muslim, etc., are missing from the account. The children learning from this textbook aren’t old enough to have accurate memories of what transpired in 2001. If this is the textbook used in a classroom, students will not learn anything at all about why America was attacked- only that an attack took place. Their education will be horribly incomplete.
This is why you don't send your email queries from your work email. Your query is not personal and confidential to me. It's a query. If I like your work, I need to talk about it to other people.
Selection of Korean-born Jim Yong Kim draws criticism from other candidates over alleged US dominance of powerful post. The World Bank has named a Korean-American medical doctor, Jim Yong Kim, as its next president, despite criticism of the selection process by his rivals for the job.
Sign up for a iPhone on O2 and you'll have 18 months of bad luck.
Billy Nungesser targeted Obama as the only “hope for continuing the work.” In an unforgiving dispatch Billy outlined viable options for the President to consider. Nungesser begged, “Don’t shut us down, let us lay the pipe three miles out and then … move the dredge so we will be down less than a day and we’ll refill the hole.”
I did hear a report or two from friends who witnessed evidence that their precious progeny have had it a little too good for a little too long. (Don’t worry; I won’t “out” anybody.) Luckily, this is pretty fixable if your kids are still young – or young-ish. Here are some thoughts on what you can change to reverse the spoilage:
I'm grateful for fitness inspirations like Jamie Eason. It's so nice to have these women to not only act as examples of fitness and clean eating, but to give us the tools to achieve the same goals.
My crime TV of choice used to be UK and US based. I grew up with Suchet’s Poirot and Hickson’s Marple, and it’s to Miss Marple I return if ever I’m feeling defeated by the world. Again, it has the bonus of good knitwear. CSI was a favourite for a while but accidentally watching a ton of CSI Miami cured me of that. Bones was good until it jumped the shark and I still have a soft spot for NCIS and The Mentalist. But after a while all these shows felt tired, the same tropes being recycled between them over and over again. If there’s a guest star of moderate fame, he’s going to be the killer. So I stopped watching. For a while, I thought I could get into sci-fi because I liked Battlestar and Firefly but then I gave my husband the Farscape boxset for Christmas. Cripes.
VIP protection services get big increases
That girl in Switzerland
Ok, see you there. JP
Hey, everyone!! I’m so honored and excited to be creating alongside The Craft’s Meow team this month! I so enjoy this little hobby of mine, and have recently taken it to a local nursing home where we get together once a month to make a card that I’ve prepared. While I’m proud of my publications and other honors, it’s hard to beat the “oooo’s” and “aahhhh’s” I hear from the residents when I pull out the card we’ll be making each month, or when we lift that acrylic block together to see what we’ve created underneath. Sharing this hobby with others is what makes it so much fun, and I really appreciate the opportunity to be able to share with you all here at TCM this month!
"I shall race with you young whippet for I have something to prove before I exit this mortal coil and head up to the great bone-yard in canine heaven,
How did it all play out? Let's see....
Mission completed
Mile 20 (Chris N, Rod & Kris)
His friend, a native Frenchie, was also there, en route to Poland.
I create, recreate, and sometimes I destroy.
14 Have you ever stolen other people's food?
All of the lights
years n years of watching all your ILLICIT petting
Bourbon Street! It’s its own kind of exciting but if you’re right on the main thoroughfare, things do get a little noisy. There are plenty of reasonably priced historic and modern hotels nearby that will allow you to get some quality sleep while you’re there. New Orleans is a very walkable city if you’re near the French Quarter, so it’s worth staying within that boundary for sight seeing, eating and shopping convenience.
The puppet being used to effect their vile behaviour as a Kangarroo Court was the ever willing dupe Douglas Denny a fantasist and a liar with absolutely ZERO morality, as shown by the irrefutable fact that his own colleagues voted him out of office as returning officer for his dishonesty, corruption and dragging UKIP's reputation into his gutter.
Farragher Bros. – Stay the Night
Sleep: No complaints.
In a small bowl, combine mayo, lemon juice, and dijon mustard. In another small bowl, combine parsley, garlic salt, pepper, Parmesan cheese, and panko.
Perhaps the extremely uncomfortable pelvic pressure.
In this same universe I had one final far-future story, something that I never developed beyond a single image of a little girl who climbs up the outside of abandoned skyscrapers, who lives high above the ruins of New York City. I like my clever title for this section: “Nell The Conqueror”.
The collage below I made shortly after my 13-year-old son was born. It hangs in my living room and I still muse upon it: where I was then, where I am now, what has been fulfilled, what is timeless and essential in it and becomes more obviously so over time.
We men – call our friends by aliases (Boy Kulangot, Boy Tigas, Tukmol, etc)
in my marriage (though I
When he went to place them in his mailbox, he found a bill from the lawyer.
As some of the quilts get closer to being finished, I will try to get photos. I picked out a black background and 9 different bright batiks – the quilts will be beautiful!.
After dinner the advanced (i.e. crazy) group decided to scale some unnamed peak next to the site. It didn’t look to difficult to me just nasty – lots of bushes to whack, mosquitoes, so I passed (there were some other reasons also, one of them was that I started enjoying the book that brought). But the view from the top was probably spectacular.
The light came from a torch standing straight up, apparently without support, half-way down to the pool. It looked as if someone had simply balanced it there on the rock, until Rel stumbled and slipped past on his way down the slope and saw that in fact the wooden shaft descended into the stone of the floor. It might have grown there, except that it was - very roughly - carved, and the rock around its base showed no sign of the crack that would give a plant purchase.
Reminding us that you're never too old to learn and that while our commutes progressively get slower, our perception of time seems to get faster. Not weak at all.
Me ? because I used to wish if I could not have a horse, that I could be a horse.
Outraged readers of Sarawak Report have been queuing up to dish the dirt on BN’s Dirty Datuks over the past few days.
prophesy concerning which
There was only a tiny bit of fabric left to bring home and I've got another friend who will get what is left. I am really on a mission to "downsize" the amount of fabrics that I have. However, I am not on a mission to "downsize" my friends. We love getting together and we have so much fun. Unfortunately, I got tired and I guess it's because I'm still recovering from my surgery. I left about 2:00 p.m. and got home just in time to call my daughter and then take a nap. There were thunderstorms in the area so she said she'd be my "weather warning" and call if storms were near. Sure enough......two hours later, just as I woke from my nap, she called. Quite a few storms rolled through last night and because of that, I stayed off the computer most of the evening. Today is sunny and bright and very humid. More storms could be on the way. I love the sound of rain, so I don't mind.
You’ll also notice that there’s only one small tent erected to deflect the searing intensity of massive quantities of ultraviolet radiation from the sun. When you get to the party, there are already six-hundred people jammed under it like sardines in a can. The only time anyone leaves the shade is to sprint to the keg with the rapidly melting ice to grab a glass of foam, and then run back to jostle with Aunt Betty for the last lawn chair.
Let me realize
1. Recipient participation
Rom 16:5 (NIV) Greet also the church that meets at their house…
The State shall regulate the relations between workers and employers, recognizing the right of labor to its just share in the fruits of production and the right of enterprises to reasonable returns to investments, and to expansion and growth.
Alternate history webcomic about an Africa that never existed, one run by steel and springs, commanded by vast matriarchies and past the height of its culture.
The F.U.'s are one of earliest boston hardcore bands in their time. Their first exposure was on the This is Boston, Not L.A. compilation along with fellow bands Jerry’s Kids and Gang Green but i wanna talk about this release.This release contains 13 great song but for me best song on this shit are song called "Do We Really Want to Hurt You" like a title of release.Its very fast&furios and great sound recording.I recommended this shit to download.I hope you will like this such a great release.Cheers!!
I always liked Robert Freeman‘s weary cover photograph for Beatles For Sale, tired faces staring back at you & I remember hunting for the album for a while. But I was pretty enamoured with this copy of Twist & Shout at the time:
A lot of those wine bars are now closed or became part of chains run by big drinks companies.
From the very first page Taylor opens up a world of folklore and fairytale. The winter location of Prague feels 18th Century and very mystical - a perfect setting for the otherworldly Karou. She - with her tattoos and blue hair and artistic ability - is one of the strongest female protagonists I've seen in a YA novel for a while. She is strong yet vulnerable, talented, sardonic and brave.
I used my score pal to make the flowers.
Zat so?
Things have greatly improved since those days. Children with special needs are much more likely to be diagnosed and get the help they need.
As if some serendipitous encounter consumed us—on different continents during two separate eras—my past met with his present as he sought to define his future.
Before Viet Khang, only a handful young Vietnamese oversees knew about the atrocities committed by the Communist Party. Now, Vietnamese people across the continents, young and old alike, are now conscious of the dire situation that the Party has put the country into. As young Vietnamese living oversees, what can we do about it? As individuals who are shut out from the Communist system, it may feel like we are powerless in dealing with the Communist Party. This however, is a misconception.
and I am super glad to have the cheeky bugger back!
Save the date for the Holly Jolly!
Children, abused and battered, some physically some mentally , sexually used from an early age . What chance have they got their heart so full of rage. Some will become abusers for abuse is all they know, some will with help flourish and try to teach it should not be so.
Worse than any of this, however, is the incomparably awful musical score. It’s absolute torture, the over-the-top melodramatic orchestral accompaniment to the story, suggesting, nay, stating outright, that the audience is too dim to pick up on what emotion they should be feeling and needs to be hit over the head with booming kettle drums and violin crescendos in order to grasp that something important is happening on the screen. I’ll be expanding on this in another blog post, but suffice to say: it’s unbearable.
The City and The City is solid detective mystery set in one of the most original backgrounds I’ve come across in a long time that can even induce a little self-reflection. See? Nothing to worry about.
“Lips that taste of tears, they say are the best for kissing.” (Dorothy Parker)
I hate them because they have the nerve to smile at me
This Sunday, July 17, from 1 to 3 p.m., you can enjoy "Walt Whitman's Fort Greene Park," a stroll sponsored by the Fort Greene Park Conservancy and The Walt Whitman Project.
I hope you like this card and I woulod really appreciate it if you had a minute to leave a comment for me telling me what you think of it.
Aktien-Brauerei Kaufbeuren AG Buronator Doppelbock
It was all so quick! I only had a five minute slot. I was ushered into the studio with about two minutes to go until I was on, and the presenter told me I had five minutes to 'sell it' before they moved on to the next feature. I actually enjoyed the whole experience, and now that I've got the first one out of the way I'm looking forward to doing more.
Warrick and Rowena are in love, of course, and marry. As he rides off into the sunset to fight a battle, he asks her:
But there is, unfortunately, a seamy corner of the Jewish world that we would do well not pretending that it does not exist. It exists – it exists because the culture is that decadent, and because young people looking for love, attention and respect often seek it in the wrong places and in the wrong activities – and they wind up without love or respect, although they do capture the attention, temporarily at least, of the exploiters and predators."
Interesting people
Do you have any pets?
Typical.
Our vacation has really thrown off my schedule. I just realized that I hadn't picked a winner for my Cystic Fibrosis Fundraising blog candy.
If you have never heard of Mary Jane or her magazine you should check it out. It embodies, I think what we prim girls are always trying to achieve, living life at it's fullest through creativity, self sufficiency and time tested, tried and true wisdom/methods.
2. I cut out the pattern and traced it onto some clear vinyl.
The ink of generic cartridges can be libelous to your printer's nozzles. Try to desist using these kinds of cartridges.
I'll never forget how they stood there looking soggy and bewildered. As soon as they gathered their wits together they left and we were never bothered with them again.
Don’t just blindly pay the renewal. Usually, the insurance company gives you advance notice of the renewal, including the new cost for the next year. With technology, you can easily go online to shop and compare. And most insurance companies are required to allow you to cancel your policy upon 30 days’ notice.
I did OK. The system seemed a little haphazard; everyone dived in, picked up whatever they wanted, shoved it in bags or boxes which were then left in a pile while you went back to search some more. When you'd done, the man in charge tipped out your items, ran a cursory eye over your selection, and came up with a fairly random figure. Some dealers were haggling; I just paid, without really knowing if he was overcharging me or not. It turned out I paid an average of 35p an item, which is fine with me.
All the lil notes fit inside of the box, the box closes up and the ribbon ties around the front! A fun little loving gift to give to someone! Now make sure and hop over to the store blog "Follow Your Heart" to see the rest of the DT's lovely projects!
The object of the Act is to protect people who are faced with eviction or who want to strengthen the newly-defined “rights” of occupiers of property. In a nutshell, this Act gives persons occupying rural or peri-urban land, with the consent of the owner or person in charge, a right of residence that can only be terminated in accordance with the provisions of the Act. The Act further regulates the day to day relationship between owners, persons in charge and persons who occupy the owner’s land. The Act is enforceable through the magistrates’ courts, the Land Claims court and, in certain instances, the provincial high courts. Occupiers may therefore obtain security of tenure on someone else’s land at the expense of the owner and/or at cost to the taxpayer.
I love to use My Publisher.* I really like this company because the software is easy to use but very versatile. I have made several photo books with them already.
younger men (under 35)
Height (including grasp): 0.9 inches (2.3 centimeters)
I forgive myself that I have accepted and allowed myself to want and desire a relationship and agreement but have not been willing to walk an effective preparation as myself in restoring my self dignity and honour towards life so that I am willing to actually approach another in openness and self worthiness where in I am seeing me as being an effective agreement/relationship partner.
Many sections of Albinia’s novel are actually narrated by Ganesh. The god wants to correct the belief that Vyasa was the author of the Mahabharata. As he tells the reader, “I freely admit that my sworn enemy is Vyasa, pedestrian composer of India’s too-long epic, a poem called the Mahabharata, every word of which I wrote” (Albinia 26). Ganesh also wants to reveal Vyasa’s true character. He says: “Now, in the Mahabharata, Vyasa portrays himself as a holy sage, with matted hair and an otherworldly air, an expert teacher, the counsellor of kings, the wise old grandfather of his characters. He builds up a fabulous portrait: comforting yet aloof, clever yet alluring. I have only one problem with this benign vision: it is totally untrue. In these pages of mine, I will correct the misapprehension under which mortals have languished for so long. I will show how Vyasa disrespected ladies, failed to dissuade his descendants from mutual carnage, gave students of literature headaches with his prose.” (29).
The average American consumes more than his or her weight in products each day, many US two year-olds can recognise the McDonald’s “Golden Archers” sign, although they cannot read the letter, and an average western family spends more on their pet than by someone trying to live in Bangladesh.
In December, the Portas Review outlined 28 recommendations that range from the creation of a new National Market Day to lowering the cost of town-centre parking. Hundreds of towns have applied to become a Portas Pilot Town, one of 12 towns that will share a £1m “golden ticket”.
Her maiden name was Gertrude Hobbs. But when she became Mrs. Oswald Chambers, for some reason, her husband began calling her "Biddy." Before the death of Oswald Chambers in 1917, a few of his sermons had been published. Some had been printed in booklets, but not a single book had gone to press.
Because she can't jump up into my lap as Mulligan and Ringo did when I was working on the computer, she has decided to take over an old desk chair. Yes, she has her very own chair sitting by the computer now. Sometimes she will lay on the floor near my feet, but most of the time she will curl up in the old chair - and sleep there most of the day on occasion ! Silly cat.
It’s not always something that is outright or blunt. Sometimes it comes in small packages or small doses. Sometimes it is unrecognizable. Disguised.
"Hi sweetie,
Wow. It has been a while since I have posted. In the last 6 weeks or so, we put our condo on the market, sold it, looked for a house, bought a house and now we are spending hours pouring over magazines and websites planning the few renovations we can afford to do and worrying about packing, moving and expenses. It’s been such a whirlwind that I haven’t had time to really consider the fact that we are moving. This home, this labor of love (we completely gutted and remodelled nearly every square inch), is where my husband and I returned after our honeymoon. I got pregnant here and this is where I brought our son home. It’s the only home he has known and the only place I have truly felt at home since moving from Toronto in 2000. Our condo is in the heart of my “comfort zone” here in Montreal – it’s on the Plateau where I have lived the last 10 years since moving here from Toronto. We are now leaving the hustle and bustle of downtown living. It’s a huge transition; no longer will I be able to walk out my front door and be within steps of cafes, shops, restaurants, depanneur’s, SAQ’s and grocery stores. No longer will I be comforted by the white noise of passing traffic. I have a little less than 2 months here and I plan to make the most of it.
Good Morning! I'm not sure if you've heard, but today is Digital Scrapbooking Day! If you read my blog regularly, you might have caught my post from Wednesday, where I gave the My Memories Suite software a test run. Seriously, if you've ever considered Digital Scrapbooking, this weekend would be a GREAT weekend to start! Between sales and coupons, you could get the software for next to nothing!
I decided to use this Digi Doodle Shop image called "Broken Dolly" for their latest challenge, "Paper Piercing." This has always reminded me a little of Norman Rockwell's, Doctor and the Doll, one of my favorite paintings.
Are there ‘safe things’ you say yes to? Are there areas where you could say yes more? to create independence, perhaps letting him serve their own cereal etc.
Today I had a check for $200 from a colleague in New York, which would cover the last week’s past due rent but not the late fees. Now, I could not put the check in U.S. Bank because I’ve met my $60.00 overdraft limit plus $40.00, roughly, in fees so a deposit would not have yielded me the $200.00 needed. So I had to spend $3.00 that was needed for other things to ride the bus down to the Rapid Cash store where I have an account to cash the check — with a 10 percent fee. I walked out the door with $180.00, $20.00 shy of what I need. It was a no-win situation either way. We have another $200.00 on hand from family and that pays for this week’s rent (today through next Friday). And the manager insists on at least two days in late fees today and perhaps three days in fees tomorrow. And we have to put $5.00 on the wireless tomorrow. We have another $50.00 coming in today plus maybe $40.00 in cash tomorrow (a big maybe because that’s arriving via the US Postal Service).
forget?
Despite an awful hill on mile 2, the coasted through the 1st 5 miles exactly and was exactly where I wanted to be! I was a little disappointed in my strategy though. In the day leading up to the race(after looking at last years results), I realized that I had a shot to finish in the top 10! Once I realized this, I decided to latch on to some of the lead pack and push through whatever pain came with it! I followed this strategy for the 1st 2.5-3 miles. I then got a little scared of the possible negative consequences of sticking with the leaders and decided to run my own race. While I was a little disappointed with myself for not committing to my original strategy, things were still looking good!
-Boil the milk and wait till the mix thickens to a pudding like consistency.(takes 10 mins)
I’m just afraid that anyone who is reading this will ask lotsa
I am learning the facts of life through my fingers, typing my words but learning as I go along..is this silly?
Oh, one more thing! To those who are waiting to see updates on the blog, but are getting impatient, do drop on over to the following spaces as I drop alot of sporadic sneak peeks while the blog is being prepped :) There's a whole lot of stuff up there now! :D
After about a decade I learned how to agree with my parents on a few things: the beautiful view, the breathtaking sight of one of those mountains covered in eternal snow – indescribable! I still go there and just look at it!! I go there and ski. I love skiing… and sometimes I go up there just to make myself clear once more, how unbelievably powerful God has to be to give us something so beautiful!!
Remove from the stove, take out the sixpence. Should it have turned black you will know the food is poisonous - otherwise it is all right.
The group is called “A TRUE CHURCH”, they are located in Moody, OK. First off let’s start with some of the things these people are being taught -
- 4th: Happy 4th of July! The day started with a parade and ended with a BBQ, family and fireworks. -
In spiritual terms, I think that part of the Lord’s prayer means that as we understand nobody really owes us anything—every good thing is a gift freely given—and as we let go of demanding goodness of each other, or even wishing and hoping for it, we are ourselves more free from the demands others place on us, including the internalized expectations we have learned to inflict on ourselves. Our own debt load is reduced.
'AND HOW ARE WE?'
I have been awake to the evils of the New World Order and the evils of international corporate socialism for more than twenty years and have been working to educate people from all walks of life through lectures, class study, and internet forums for years. I think it is absolutely important to not only educate and reinforce the history of constitutional liberty in these United States, but also to work to dispel myths that have been propagated by our enemies.
I am not your PA, your secretary, your chaffeur or your personal slave. GET ORGANISED. I, believe it or not, have my own job. You're employed by ME!
July was struggling with the screenplay for her second feature film, The Future, and found herself too easily distracted by the internet. She laments that her writing career had managed a meagre output before cyber ubiquity settled into its now permanent state of flashing cleavage and kittens in front of anybody trying to get work done on a laptop. But were there any distractions left untouched by the virtual?
I'm at work, listening to the rain fall, and all I can think about it is the carousel I saw last Saturday. My mother took me to see Julie & Julia (very good movie btw), and then I noticed that in the Palisades Mall in West Nyack, NY they're taking down the carousel in the Food Court. It looked so sad in it's dismembered state. Only a few horses and the lovers' chair remained. How apropiate though for this time in my life. I imagine that's what it's like to be 24. I'm an adult who needs to grow up, take down the unicorn posters, but there is still a few notes of childhood playing and dreams of a perfect love left. I will post pictures in the next blog.
Although California's seasons are weak compared to most of the mainland, I'm still a sucker for fall fashion and am thrilled I get to experience anything lower than 60 degrees. I swear, I didn't even know what trouser socks were until I was 28. Don't get me started on the night I freaked out seeing "smoke" coming out of my mouth for the first time. Cold air coming out of our mouths when we breathe? That's madness!
“Feel the joy, happiness and thankfulness in your abdomen that you now have what you have wanted. Bring the picture from your head and the feelings from your abdomen together in your heart. Speaking from the centre in your heart, say the words which you have chosen three or seven times clearly and audibly. Maintain the picture of your receipt and your feelings throughout. Stand up, thank yourself for having done it and go about your daily business. “
So, I painted it blue and distressed it. Then, I applied 2 coats of wipe-on poly. I also added a shelf and trimmed it out with molding. This is the first time I have ever altered a piece of furniture with more than paint. I was pretty excited about the way it turned out. I love how the cream and the bare wood show through in spots.
Here’s how it breaks down. For sales on the Book Country site itself, writers receive 70% royalties. This part, at least, is justifiable. Book Country are providing a retail platform, they are processing the sales, and dealing with the customers. And it’s a comparable percentage to the major retailers. Plus their name is a biggie.
Fragile Earth’s innovative swipe function allows users to see years pass under their fingertips – from as far back as 1914 to the present day – by dragging multiple photographic layers across their screen to reveal images of a site before, during and after the landscape has changed.
Rel sat down, aware that his legs were giving him no choice in the matter. "The Gift?"
Work Table
There are folks like Chef Toni Robertson, who, for the last three years, has helped students from the Mott Hall School in New York plant a vegetable garden and learn healthy eating habits -– even throwing salad parties for parents. That's a good thing.
Shalom in Messiah
Are there guys out there that just respect a woman, that are not intimidated by intelligence? Confidence?
This is the fourth night shift in a row and I'm feeling the pain.
Now, having won, I was supposed to host the up coming week .... but I went MIA.
Yes, she was alone in her own house but she was not lonely. There was so much light! It was just on that one spot where she kept her own fireplace to be lit!
No, you are not a famous athlete.
It has to rely on the civic sense of the institutional bodies like the electricity board and the generosity of private owners.
Winner, Étoile d’Or 2001 – Best First Film
I mean, Sure, I liked spaghetti, but I thought that was all there was to pasta dishes. I didn’t know that pasta was good for you, that you can mix it with all kinds of other dishes and that it was really easy to cook. Until I had my own family and started cooking on my own.
eating Thai green curry
Okay, so back to the story. When my dad and uncle bought the park, it came with a couple of rental trailers. Typically, these would be rented out for long periods of time. There wasn’t a lot of transient business at that time. But every so often, someone would move out and my dad was left with the responsibility for cleaning it up for the next tenant – that is, my dad and his helpers. In retrospect, I’m almost certain we weren’t that much help……..but I was an expert at holding a flashlight! And whether you were patching a floor or unstopping a sewer line, you needed someone to hold the flashlight.
Don’t worry, I haven’t packed up my world into boxes, but I have changed my way of doing things. I am determined to finish projects and not leave them around incomplete cluttering up my ,home and creativity. So far this week we have a completed tapestry and a bean bag. I now need to translate this way of working to my writing. All of those half-finished stories, poems and novels beware, you are about to be extracted from your boxes (lol) and finished. Watch this space and wish me luck.
No, I didn't leave the show with any autograph cards, patch cards, or super-snazzy vintage. But don't complain.
Mysteriously, with the sound of wind-chimes
In a double boiler (or put about 1 cup water in a sauce pan, simmer and top with a heatproof mixing bowl), place butter, semisweet and unsweetened chocolate in the bowl over the hot water. Stir frequently until mixture has melted completely. Remove bowl from heat carefully and set aside to cool slightly.
I have decided to give you an early Christmas present. Giving helps calm me down. And giving early...well, that makes me feel oh so accomplished!
So there I stood at Karwar beach at 7:10pm, having cycled 180k that day about 525 in all, with no place to sleep yet. There was an immense sense of achievement as the waves washed over my feet and the wheels of the bicycle. I had managed to make it all the way to the coast. My bicycle had touched the sea.
Japanese and German call that critter a "Wash Bear" (Araiguma in Japanese, Waschbär in German) because they wash their hands (paws).
So whether the policy is good or bad in general, I think it is a great boon to British beer. Already the resurgence of craft and heritage beer is gaining momentum and this will be a big help, one thinks, in getting these beers in markets across England.
All this though is giving my wee pea brain a bit of a dilemma. do i aim to do the lakeland 100 in 2013, my ultimate ultra goal and dream, or do i change direction to shorter fell/trail races? decisions decisions. i know where my heart lies. And on that note next up is the lakeland 50 recce this sunday :) from pooley bridge to ambleside, with a few obstacles in the way!
James Keene You wana do what to a pig?
Boatmen are dancing on the ripple snake program in Newalla
Yup, he’s taken, ladies. Fall back. *sigh* Time for the speed round of randomness. Ready? Go!
Please join us on Tuesday, March 30th at 7:00 for a social night with fellow salonistas. We want to see your creative selves especially if you are thinking about attending but feeling shy, moody, intimidated, uninspired or just downright sick and tired of the business of business.
Fussing with that (parts of which I couldn’t get rid of until I “manually” deleted them really set up a grumpy me. So I did a full scan in accordance with Microsoft’s recommendation.
By Joszann St. John
‘But his administration never would have had the opportunity to do the right thing had it not been for some extraordinary work during the George W. Bush administration.
Anyway, because I didn’t manage to get my arse out of bed this morning, I dig through my extensive back catalogue of ride photography and dig up a morning mist in North Wagga. These are from a few days ago. Beautiful isn’t it?
She said she has heard it from her father countless times: A Chechen girl who loses her virginity before marriage is a prostitute, and Allah will punish her.
“Maknae has decided to major in theater and film, and she will be debuting soon as well. Yesterday, she met with her director and will be sitting down for dinner with KBS officials today. They say they like maknae’s clear image, but I’m a bit worried because she doesn’t know anything about dressing herself up and is a bit countrified…”
Two Brothers Heavier Handed Imperial Wet-Hopped IPA will be available in draft only this year in select locations that support Two Brothers regularly.
At the top found the Boa Constrictor… tubes that went down through mud into a big pool of water and then came out on another side. This one will test your claustrophobia to the limit. Fortunately I’m not claustrophobic and thought this one was fun. Though, one of my team members cut his hand real bad coming out of it… meh, it’s TM.
In anticipation of the book's February 21, 2012 release date, I'm setting up a blog button for anyone who would like to help me spread the word. Then, on February 21*, if you post about the release of the book, you will be entered to win an e-copy of the book. I'll be giving away several e-copies. To find out how to participate, go here: Rising Release & Info
# # This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify # it under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by # the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or # (at your option) any later version. # # This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful, # but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of # MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE. See the # GNU General Public License for more details. # # You should have received a copy of the GNU General Public License
For U Create's Create with Me project for July, Kari and readers chose the mirror frame tutorials features on Sausha's blog Show & Tell. The hall/kids/guest bathroom was my target for the month. My sister having her baby, school starting, sick kids and life all got in the way but I plugged away and got this little tiny bathroom 90% done. All that is left is a faucet, some accessories, and some trim detail. I had hoped to get it all done over one long weekend. Ha.
lives within her,
I love caterwauling women
In a triumph of crony capitalism, Trzupek notes that “The big winner will be Obama’s good friend, GE Chairman Jeff Immelt. Since solar and wind cannot fill a 50,000 megawatt baseload gap, the only way to ensure continued reliability of the grid is to build a lot of natural gas-fired plants quickly. And who is the biggest supplier of natural gas-fired combustion engines? GE of course.”
I'm only going over home"
I thought that sharing the first chapter of my novel, A Life Without, would give you a better idea of who I am and what I write. For those of you on my personal page, I’m sorry to post this again but I’m hoping my new fans will love it as much as you all have.
Top Layer: Melt the chocolate and butter in the microwave. Spread the melted chocolate evenly over the filling and refrigerate until the chocolate has set.
You can use the rough side or smooth. Cold press for more texture and to let your paint soak in, or hot press is clean and smooth. I use rough and cold, but that's just what I like.
We were on the subway to the British School by 11:30. They pulled their uniforms over sports jerseys (Kenny wore Tuck), to stares and laughter from commuting Beijingers.
Thank you for all the fun day I have,
A boxed cake (and accompanying ingredients--usually 3 eggs, oil, and water)
Good Morning All, I hope you are All keeping well, Its Wednesday and Time for our Freebie challenge at Dudetime Doodles, For my card ive coloured Mo, with promarkers, Xcut die cut rounds, backing papers are Papermaina capsule Lincoln Linen, buttons and ribbon from stash.
In the Basilica, della Rovere asks the French ambassador how the French king feels about the papacy being in the hands of an ape. The ambassador says the king hopes the grace of God can help transform the worst of men, and if it doesn’t, he’ll happily observe the fireworks from afar.
“We now find ourselves in a position where we are outvoted by 26 to 1. We are in a hopeless minority and yet we still have 75 per cent of our laws that run the United Kingdom made in these institutions,” said the politician. “Cameron’s not wishing to do this has now opened up the real debate in the UK about our European future.”Farage warns the UK against an “economic prison” similar to the one now faced by the Greek people, whose lives are now falling under the control of their creditors: the European Union, the International Monetary Fund and the European Central Bank...via RT.com
5.Initiative: individual, group, or something else?
Last year I heard from folks from Alaska to Australia who participated and reported their kids had had fun.
A final note here concerning the timing of this announcement: the Kepler mission results are expected soon. This spacecraft uses a very different technique than the radial velocity method outlined above. Rather, Kepler uses the technique of "transits". It stares at a set field of stars, watching for a specific kind of subtle dip in the brightness of one of them which can only be caused by an orbiting planet eclipsing its parent star. There are several nice things about this technique. First, we know its orbit must be nearly edge-on to produce an eclipse, which it turn means knowing its exact mass using a follow up radial velocity technique, not just its minimum mass. Second, by studying exactly which colors of light are absorbed more than others, we have a spectral fingerprint which allows us to identify the exact constituents of the planet's atmosphere, which in turn gives us a better handle on the planet's true temperature rather than just its equilibrium temperature.
Faith allows us to see hope in the most hopeless of situations.
ME: Good one.
Those people wishing to take the simplest option may forward their letters and statements of support through PFLAG.
He walked away. I failed that particular set. But I was still okay, because at least I showed up.
For a cold winter's evening it's really quite comforting, but it's a beer I could see working as a summer's day quencher just as easily.
There were hats to be tried on ..
A spokesman for the BNP confirmed that Mr Griffin had attended a political rally in Madrid.
Bad Madison :)
Cities of Bone is a minicampaign associated with the Al-Qadim setting. I just recently picked up a used copy because I have a weakness for necromancy themes. I don't own any other Al-Qadim products (though I did own Arabian Adventures at one point), so I'm not sure exactly how it fits in, but it seems somewhat self-contained. I love the idea of a desert land strewn with ruins, though if I ran this myself I would probably make it more culturally neutral rather than use all the custom classes and spells (which are mostly detailed in other products anyways).
Oh and Sheepy.... If I never hear about Sheepy again it'll be too soon.... Just saying.
I sometimes find myself wondering, what does it mean to be a good mother? From a child's perspective, what does a mother do? Wash, iron, make lunches? No, I really don't think that's it. A mother's willing to fight for you, to stand up for you, to know when you're down and can stop to listen. Lynda Mullaly Hunt's debut novel, One for the Murphys, will touch kids, perhaps make them cry, but it will also start them thinking. What does it mean to stand up for your family?
needed a little something to take up the void until I get the desk finished. If You haven't
It's good. It didn't last 3 hours.
penetrating
"One of the main objectives of our tour is to have an exchange on labor issues here, and introduce the federation to the North American labor movement so we can support and show solidarity with your struggles. What is happening in Wisconsin and other parts of your country are opportunities that the U.S. working class should not miss" .This is the time, she added, to unite for dignified jobs and confront the attacks on collective bargaining rights.
Too busy tasting the real thing in the dark
So, I registered for a half marathon. I've been running a few 10k's here and there, but I haven't done a half marathon since the Disneyland half in 2006. More than five and a half years ago. Pre-kids.
Tasogare Otome x Amnesia (Episode 4) – The use of colors and lighting in any anime always stands out to me and Tasogare Otome x Amnesia has separated itself from any other anime this season with its constant and brilliant use of varying colors and lights to enrich the atmosphere and generate visual interest in the same school scenery we see every week. Among the most outstanding examples are the way the skies comes out and the swimming pool scene at night that ended this episode is certainly worthy of taking up this entire episode reviews. That use of color and balance of light lies somewhere beyond dazzling and inspirational. And that’s not all there was in this episode, too. The way the colors gradually shifted during the classroom scene with Yuuko and Teiichi was marvelous. Something subtle as playing with the lighting and colors in a scene is enough to refocus your attention and glue your eyes in on the screen. It’s captivating the way Tasogare Otome x Amnesia uses its colors and lighting and is a reason why it’s one of my favorites this season.
I really did love our last house, but looking back, the decor seems too old for us. I was inspired mainly by model homes (which I kind of loathe now. . . ). This was our family room:
Amazon must be quaking in their boots.
When she opened the oven her PINK house lit up with the SWEET smell of CUPCAKES!
About half an hour later she called me back in - I was not expecting to be presented with this little scene!
Finally stuck on sentiments distressed and wooden pencil with red painted end.
We were picked up, again with the awesome sign with our names on it, and driven to our hostel. All of this was arranged by Intrepid, and included in our trip. The car this time was a much newer, and nicer crossover. Our driver was super friendly and courteous. A great first impression of where we will be for the next seven days.
I stood apologetic – I prejudged her age and awareness. Moreover, I use excuses and only use treadmill.
No, right! You might be totally forgotten about the “DIRT”.
My Pop, Gil King DFM lead the March every year holding the largest of the Australian Flags in a holster. Dressed in school uniform we'd walk behind them and our parents behind us. Until we crossed my Nana Pat sanding on the corner of Jopling Street. She would wave and smile at Pop, at us, at everyone. But her eyes didn't smile. She hated ANZAC Day. She still does.
Is my love for you
Coffee filters - success! If I used white ones, the color would have been more true - but I like the country color look.
As we enter the room, it looks just like a classroom with desks and a chalkboard. But the walls were half chain link, there were 2 overflowing bookshelves with used books, and a tattered flat soccer ball in the corner. The children sat obediently wondering what the heck we wanted from them, I'm sure.
● Deleted & Extended Scenes
The theatre is in a one-story building with a cavernous interior. I very much doubt it was purpose-built for plays. My guess is that it was once an auditorium or a church. The volunteers, who run the youth theatre group, have done their best to spruce up what would otherwise be a plain room with high ceilings and old, threadbare carpet.
I shouldn’t need to say why that’s so bad. The thing is though, that character – Tsugumi – spends nearly her entire time in the skin tight plugsuit that also apparently offers nothing in the way of ‘firmness’, and she’s the token loli. She basically exists for the sake of fanservice. And is like 14 or something. Oh, and she’s the fairly archetypical tomboy-esque loli at that. Creativeness, thy name is not Guilty Crown.
I'm blogging because I can blog. Not because I in actuality appetite to, or even accept the action for things like 'thinking logically' or 'bowel movements'.
You could argue that they contribute by not being a drain on the NHS in later life. If you did argue this, it would mark you out as a bit of a moron. People don’t get fat without eating food. Lots and lots of food. If I wanted to lose a few inches off my waistline there are two ways I could do this; eat less and do more. Eating less is cheaper than eating more. Why aren’t the slimmers themselves paying for the very special diet food out of the surplus they have in their pockets by not stocking up on Findus Crispy Pancakes?
Lyndsee is warned, "Leave it alone," just before her mother exits the kitchen.
Cut out with scissors .
Have a great weekend y'all.
In 1916, at the age of 69, she appeared in her first film as Julia Lovelace in ‘Her Greatest Performance’, and she maintained a successful stage acting career until 1920, and also appeared in films until 1922. Her career lasted almost 70 years.
We are being tested! God is further seperating the wheat from the tares. True, believing in this date doesn’t mean someone is saved, but we know we are in a major testing and trial period. God bless you!
My self-published book, (title), received the Barnes and Noble Rising Star Award in 2009, placing it in stores along the east coast. My book (title 2) is being re-released by (publisher) later this year.
Sadly, my expectations were wrong when Monday’s writing session found me brain dead and reluctant to even open the chapter file. As I listlessly watched the cursor blinking on the page, my mind tired and barren of one viable piece of dialogue or descriptive phrase, I realized this lack of enthusiasm had been creeping into my consciousness for a couple of weeks now. As to the root cause or how permanent the affliction, I took some time this past week to evaluate my situation.
I've reworked some items in my Etsy shop and am streamlining a few things. Yarn bowls are taking over my life in more ways than one. I feel like I can make them in my sleep, I've made so many this year. I went thru a phase where I broke nearly every other one during the process...since I was so tired and stressed. I'm learning to ride the waves of business life. Definitely taking breaks during slow periods and learning ways of not getting myself stressed out when things are super busy. I'm also learning to toughen up a bit regarding competition. More on that later.
I hope you have had a great day.
4) Keith Scott. Fans get on about Mama but they really don’t know what a bad forward is. Keith Scott was the worst.
2 cups green bell pepper strips (about 2 peppers)
This is not a fashion blog. I don't do today's outfit posts, I don't review foundations and lipsticks and I will never comment on the latest H&M collection. I may occasionally write a line or two about where they stole their ideas, but that's a very different matter.
My heart now resides
And you're getting all kind of impatient waiting
4 Voodoo Child (Slight Return) 7:59
As some of you know, three months ago I had surgery for prostate cancer. I was diagnosed with the disease after a routine physical. Thankfully, the illness was caught early and the surgery was successful. You can catch the early part of the story by visiting a blog post I made two weeks after the surgery at http://lyke2drink.blogspot.com/2008/04/back-from-where-ive-been.html. Since then I had a follow up PSA test that came back with a 0.0 reading, which is fantastic news.
After I informed Nancy DO my old Gossip job was to write bitchy things about my victims, she shrank away from me, which was quite a relief as I was afraid her extended eyelashes were about to poke into my eyeballs during our cosy tête-à-tête.
when, in the past, his clones claimed the dragon family were the good guys he was working with…so this proves that a clone was writing in the past and this Fulford is an original. But what happened? Was he hood-winked and fooled, or was all that past stuff lies the clone was programmed to say?
Aspartame is made up of three chemicals:
Does procrastination worry or stress you?
1) 5 table spoons of Plum Sauce
I used Annie Sloan's chalk paint in Old White. This was my first time using chalk paint so I wasn't sure what to expect. It's all over the blogs we read so I at least wanted to try it! It was so easy to apply-especially with the chalk paint brush that is sold with it. I applied two coats (don't worry when you paint the first coat and it looks so far from done--it gets better-I promise!) and it turned out
So I now have the walking boot and he said I can begin to put some weight on it as long as it feels ok but to keep using the crutches as long as I needed. So far nothing magical happened and I’m still pretty much stuck with the crutches. I can balance a little on my left foot but walking really isn’t much of an option at this point. I’ll just have to keep working on this for the next couple weeks and I really hope to be without the crutches by the time I go back in for my next follow up on August 9th. This is when the evaluations happen and we figure out what happens next as far as rehabing. Right now he said I’m still in the healing stage so there’s not much I can do but wait.
I wasn’t sure of how much truth it held,
with some adjustments made to it,
In the early years the Pirate Party was often jokingly characterized as a bunch of spotty nerds who simply want free stuff. While this perception has changed somewhat in recent years, especially when Christian Engstrom joined the European Parliament, there is still a need to clarify the Party’s position.
Set in Cathays, the heart of student land, the Pen & Wig is the Cardiff CAMRA Pub of the Year 2010. This busy Mitchells and Butlers pub is housed in a Victorian three-storey building and features a choice of drinking areas, with wooden floors in one section and flagstones in another. At the front of the pub is a large Victorian window and an equally large old Bass brewery mirror is set to one side. Converted to a pub in 1994, the Pen & Wig manages to have an atmosphere about it that is often lacking in other pub company-owned pubs. To the rear is an outdoor drinking area, which in the summer months is a perfect sun trap. Throughout the year it is popular with smokers. The Pen and Wig still retains some of the original Victorian layout of the building, with dividing walls and doorways.
Loads of new stuff to talk about, some of it exciting, most of it not but this is my blog so if you don’t like it you know where the door is.
The colors are glorious and I'm quite happy with how it turned out...it should be ready to go by the time we go to Art Craft Fair!
Let your friends know that you created your image using WordCam. Share it on our Facebook page. We’re anxious to see what exciting, magical, artistic and fun creations you post! We’ll be happy to share those works with our fans!
Zoey went to the vet last Friday. To get her there took an act of congress but once she was inside the carrier she maintained her dignity. Unfortunately I couldn’t accompany her but was told once she was in the examining room she didn’t run or meow, not even once. The results from the blood test won’t be back until sometime next week. Hopefully, she doesn’t have diabetes or any other dreaded disease cats are prone to. If she does, I’m sure she’ll show strength like always.
Over the course of my career I have had the privilege of advising two of the largest hedge funds on the planet, five of the largest asset managers in the United States, and three of the most prominent sovereign wealth funds in the Middle East and Asia. My clients have a total asset base of more than a trillion dollars. I have always taken a lot of pride in advising my clients to do what I believe is right for them, even if it means less money for the firm. This view is becoming increasingly unpopular at Goldman Sachs. Another sign that it was time to leave.
Once the trio enters the hospital, they split up and begin their search. The Sherman Oaks Hospital, like most other hospitals, doesn’t have a high level of security. They have just enough to maintain order when something goes wrong. People come and go from hospitals all the time and it would be pointless and incredibly insufficient if people had to go through security check points like that at airports in order to gain entrance at a hospital. And besides, there’s no reason for someone to attack a hospital unless the person is mentally deranged or bares a grudge against a particular hospital or doctor. It’s a low threat target, so there is no need for a high level of security.
No hope of maybe
percent, was in contravention of Rule 20(20) of the Kuala Lumpur Stock
(5) Best Music of 2010: “The Noise” by Neal Young. It’s folk-ish and poignant and not really typical of Neal Young, but I really like it.
I am hoping to continue to incorporate these changes into my lifestyle as much as I can. I am doing well with the exercise and now it is just to work on the food. I find myself analysing everything I am thinking about eating. I have a rough idea of how many calories are in a serving, it is just to reproportion my serving sizes I think.
That sounds heavy. It is heavy though. I doubt that most people are aware that the textile industry is the world's number one polluter of fresh water. That synthetic dyes produce cancer causing carcinogens. That the slave labour force around the world is largely driven by the fashion industry. While many of our needs are taken care of without much thought on a daily basis, what we wear has a profound effect on how others see us. The fashion industry has made us walking billboards for not only their labels and brands, but also for a certain allowance that we are willing to let our values be rearranged for a smaller price tag, following trends and acceptance in society. Rebecca's stand against that is much farther reaching than simply wanting to wear beautiful and natural clothing, or even for supporting sustainability and the environment. What she is doing is reminding us that working together and building a sense of community should be a part of human need. The process of creating should be inextricably linked with covering the basics of how we live, and that clothing our bodies in this manner should portray that we are healthy, understanding, beautiful people with strong values.
“Out on thee for a dastard!” says Gisli; “but though thou broughtest us all to shame, still for all that I will go myself.”
I think we should seriously consider writing a newspaper column for CD buyers to help them on their way toward building a collection. There are a lot of 15 to 30 year olds that missed the whole golden age (1966-74) of Rock, and possibly the best of the 80s and 90s, who need a reference guide that will tell them exactly what releases to stay away from as well as which gems to track down. We could either do it in a Siskel & Ebert format where we both give our thoughts on a title, or you could take certain artists and I’ll grab others… Chapters on “sacred cows” where we trash the conventional wisdom of greatness (Van Morrison, etc.), but also make sure that they hear about Gypsy Blood, Mellow Candle, and hundreds of other “lost” classics. You and I have invested too much time in music the last 40+ years to keep this information inside our heads. I am so tired of reading Amazon reviews that turn out to be worthless, or bloggers who are way off the mark. We need to act. This is our calling, something we can leave behind for the future youth. Besides the esoteric and lost releases, we will lay down the truth on “major” acts. Deep Purple’s best is NOT Machine Head or Made in Japan. We can also list the 10 best tracks from any band (for the i-Tunes generation). I have told you before how much time I’ve wasted buying a record and not liking a group- only to find out 10, 20, sometimes 30 years later that I DO like them, I just bought the wrong title(s)…
Guitar Legends Festival, Sevilla, Spain
2. Ordered violent crackdowns on pro-democracy and trade union activists.
19- Australia Naval Communications Station Harold E Holt (NCS HEH) Exmouth, Western Australia.
11. Testify ft. Styles P
We had planned to return to Lubec on Saturday, but we ran into a friend at the film viewing who convinced us to stay an extra day. I hemmed and hawed a bit about the orders I needed to fill and all my other tasks that needed to be done....but gave in and am so glad that things turned out as they did. We spent the first part of Saturday at our friend Natasha Mayers house. She is a real mover and shaker in community arts and activism and is always interesting to spend time with. It's hard to get me to take extra down-time when there are things that need to be done in the studio, but when she suggested that we pick fiddleheads along the Sheepscot River, well, that got me. I remembered Nana always talking about picking fiddleheads while growing up in Bingham. So, for the first time ever, I got to try my hand at it. What fun! Digging in the earth, I felt right at home. It was a super relaxing time, listening to the wind in the trees and the river flowing swift.
Grilled Tilapia
Much of my internet invisibility was due to actual absence over the holiday break, because my home is in complete and total isolation from the internet, and I did little, if anything, to leave it. Thus, upon returning to college, I found my e-mail inbox flooded with many e-mails concerning WordPress updates, as well as a few from friends, mixed with a miscellaneous assortment of junk mail.
That fart changed everything. It made history. I’m not typing this to embarrass her or to over analyze a mere fart, but I was trying to examine the friendships I have with certain people. For some, I have a certain decorum and act a certain way. For others, farting is our way of saying, “you make me gassy, but I love you.”
There are a lot of things which are right. . areas where you and I can call our own shots. There are many areas where we do have choice and by golly – we should be using them. Some of the “stuff” out there, we are just going to have to learn how to deal with it. . .either fix it, take appropriate action or let it go. I am guilty of that too often - carping about what I find wrong in the world and letting that distort perspective.
And, our new year feels more like mourning than morning. Over the holidays we were seeped in death, dipped again and again and again. It did not diminish the joy of the carols, but often made them seem a little too loud.
I typically declined, as I have continued to do when attending the OF, with one more recent exception (some nuns at a monastery I was staying made me do it!), but I have to admit that I've never been able to articulate my reasons for not wanting to act as a lector very clearly.
I am huge fan of campy horror films, but after audiences’ tepid response to Piranha in 2010 there is little hope for the sequel to succeed. Usually fans flock to horror films while critics bash the film the moment the previews start, yet this marks one of the only occasions where the opposite occurred. Based on the trailer, the sequel looks even more absurd which will most likely please only hardcore horror films, but unfortunately, this won’t translate in box office success with horror fans disappearing from the cinema more and more each year. With only a $20 million budget, the gore porn flick should at least break even, but any hopes for a third installment will be put to rest.
Closed in 1990, the facility now sits as a rusting, peeling edifice of stone, steel and paint flakes. Tours are available on weekends with special emphasis on ghost tours. The facility has quite a reputation for being haunted!
I don’t have what I think of as “properly” public bookshelves: nothing leather-bound or colour-coordinated; no first editions; no careful artistic groupings. Sadly, my bookshelves do not reach such lofty heights as would require a ladder. My “best” bookshelves do look more substantial, though. In their ranks you will see my nicer hardbacks, the lovely cloth-bound fairytales that I inherited from my father, the sturdy biographies and histories, and those books of a philosophical nature. My private bookshelves are junkier, and more various. Here lie the paperbacks, but also the most frequently read favourites.
Just a quick one to say that I have not been able to comment on all blogs. It seems to be mainly the blogs that require an additional verification code to comment.You know the one where you can't just click enter at the end but have to actually click on the "post" button. I know a lot of people are having probs at the moment with blogger and hopefully they will get it fixed soon but just sos you know. I am still reading - just not able to comment on everyone's.
According to a latest data of the I-T Department (till November, 2011), a total of 13,74,03,213 PANs are valid at present.
So at the end of week 1, I have a completed flash story, a completed short story, an outlined story, and a chunk of something else. It's actually better than I thought it would be.
Now, our animals are at risk again. See this recall.
Tomorrow-Grocery Shopping! We are a bit low on food right now so in the last week we have learned to be very creative with food. They really enjoyed helping us make 6 pizzas the other night so we wouldn't have to cook for a day or two :)
It came from Joss & Main, they are this awesome online discount store. Each day they just have certain things, mainly home stuff. And once they are out, it's gone. But you can get some great prices. I believe the headboard was $199?
It works 24/7. With the right application software it can take orders, accept payments and check order status. Direct in Dial numbers or Auto Attendant can route calls to specific employees. If they’re unavailable, it can forward the call directly to their mobile device or be directed back in to your company’s voice mail to access another employee. Interactive Voice Response (IVR) and Speech Recognition can mimic human interaction to the point that working an 8 hour work day would seem like 16 hours too short!
Due to his backlog of debts, Block says he remains “one payment away from having my car repossessed” but vows to keep going because gratitude brings out the good in life.
Not only does the purging process reap HUGE benefits for the home and our lifestyle and encourage us to live more simply and eliminate duplicate and unnecessary clutter and items... it also gives you a chance to make a little money as well. I decided that I am adding a side challenge for myself personally, to my original purge 30 items in 30 days challenge.
“Life’s too short to be pissed off all the time.”
Ya'll have your version of progress and I have mine.
BioLink* Spring Resume Workshop!
Some interesting info about Hydrangeas:
Whether you call it marketing or branding or anything else is simply a question of semantics. The important question is not what you call it, but how do you do it? How do you build a strong brand?
Jump to the part that's clearly mistake #3: that would be when I semi-blindly waltzed into the ladies bathroom with my sunglasses on, wondered momentarily why there were so many stalls, shrugged, tried to enter a few stalls, found an empty one, and then began feeling odd while I listened to some poor confused woman in the next stall have a one-sided conversation on her cell-phone before I suddenly (and finally) had that feeling like someone had just thrown a bucket of cold water on me...Am I in the women's bathroom? Yup. I. am. There were no urinals! HOW THE HELL DO I GET OUT OF HERE? Then I heard a woman say to another woman, "are you in the line-up?" AND NOW THERE'S A LINE-UP? I WONDER IF ANY OF THESE WOMEN ARE CARRYING MACE? I AM GOING TO JAIL!
And so, as I write, and as I try to develop worlds in which to set my novels, I would like to try and emulate Brandon Sanderson. He has clear rules for his magic and it is not used frivolously. I like the almost scientific feel he brings to the subject of magic, and he shows that he has thought through even all of the limitations that his magic system has, forcing his characters to work around them.
And Greg and Karen’s history.
Double Drat.
The only bad thing about swim team? Someone has to drive them to the pool at 6:30 am every weekday morning (every single one).
Vincent G. Danz, 38, Farmingdale, N.Y.
We girded ourselves for another 10 minutes of listening to Alex cry, but then his sobs started losing steam. Then they stopped altogether. After a minute or two, Kate peeked into his room. He was sound asleep. He woke up a couple of times during the night, but even without being rocked, neither wake-up was drawn out more than 10 minutes. This was bliss.
PS. I do recall children’s author Roald Dahl (of Charlie and the Chocolate Factory) speaking very passionately and knowledgeably about chocolate confectionary. I believe he was buried with some chocolate. I must look into this further.
Every day, in every way, I am getting better and better to God’s glory in Christ Jesus! Amen!
Recently, I’ve heard some disappointing discussions revolving around the ad and have often found myself the lone voice of reason, defending their subversiveness, wit and poignant underlying message, among a group of up to a dozen irrational halfwits.
“Aigoo.. what is she doing here?” i asked to myself, then i walk closer to Jinki.
Sometimes I feel that I have trouble expressing my love for those who
Your body uses the protein you eat to make lots of specialized protein molecules that have specific jobs. For instance, your body uses protein to makehemoglobin (say: hee-muh-glow-bin), the part of red blood cellsthat carries oxygen to every part of your body.
I'm particularly proud of this recipe because I made it up on the fly on a night I didn't expect to be home. Essentially, it's puréed sunchokes stirred into a basic risotto. But the flavor? Anything but basic. I might have swooned.
Some people had told us we shouldn’t carry them. Some told us that just taking Mark’s passport was enough. So having a copy of our passports in my wallet all the time felt that it was enough.
I said: “’T will keep.”
However twitter has lots of other people on it that often say interesting things. Note I say interesting and not intelligent, thought through or even correct. From people exposing footballers that sleep with their sister in law, to people moaning about phone hacking journalists or even low grade big brother celebs having public slanging matches with other even lower grade big brother celebs, all of human life is as they say here. It can be a fascinating thing to tune in or out of.
Everyone ages. There will come a point as we age that we may lose the ability to take care of ourselves. When it comes to this time, it is generally a good idea to think about moving into a nursing home. Nursing homes present a situation that may not be ideal, but can offer a good option for personal care. These facilities employ licensed professionals to help residents with a high quality of care.
It was a massacre.
“The delivering of a message about a product or a service is best done when the advertiser understands the lens through which a consumer is viewing both the culture they’re in … and how their own experiences map onto it,” said U.S. Census Bureau Director Robert Groves.
Absolut vodka is a well-known brand all over the world, and recently I’ve been lucky enough to try the original, as well as several of their flavoured options.
You draw a line under your brow on the outer half like so...
1) A certain Roy Bullock would rummage in people's trash, and that he worked with a certain Tom Gerard.
I try and catch him in anything he's in (you ever watch "Parenthood"? He stars in that.) and enjoy everything he's in - every time he's on screen, big or small, it's memorable. And it's different.
Unlockable Cups
An alert Writer Beware reader recently let me know that someone calling himself J.G. Goodman has posted some unflattering comments about me and fellow scam-buster Dave Kuzminski in the forums at SFReader.com, a speculative fiction-oriented website. Searching on a few key phrases quickly located a practically identical screed from a John Goodman on Written Road, a publishing-and-writing-oriented blog. By chance, I'd also seen an earlier negative comment about me from one Dave King on the Rumor Mill, a message board for writers sponsored by the ezine Speculations (you have to scroll down a bit; it's Message 483801). I might have assumed that it was unrelated to Mr. Goodman's rantings, had not ol' Dave written me the following "neener, neener" email:
Miles remaining: 477
i am such a fan of Sharon Beesley's blog NYC Taught Me, she has 3 adorable children (1 girl and a set of twin boys) and she chronicles all her NYC adventures with them. She takes the most amazing photography all around the city...
I'll start with one of my all time favorites, High Street Market, in downtown Cincinnati.
And what was my first thought? (Other than %*@&*$%%^&%!!!!)
We now know what the proper response to 11 counts of ethics violations against one of the top congress critters is:
~What’s Next?
Now I need to stay home tomorrow and take Henry to the doctor (daycare requires a doctor’s note to return) and try to juggle work and hope I don’t bleed and oy. I am tired. But relieved to have gotten good news today. Hopefully our luck will continue.
At my meeting last Saturday, a “chronic relapser” like me asked what everyone does to stay sober. For a chronic relapser like me, I shared my number one strategy. Don’t drink.
So, my only choice is to have nothing to pick at right? (This is where you nod in agreement). Mmmhhmmmm. Yep.
Another great hot read in the VET series by Heaton. This time around the romance doesn't happen in the theatre.
Average bosses see employees as inferior, immature beings who simply can’t be trusted if not overseen by a patriarchal management. Employees take their cues from this attitude, expend energy on looking busy and covering their behinds.
Before I go on, I must point out that my take on the songs on the album are only from my own personal perspective. I am not going to start telling you how Sam achieved a particular sound for a guitar solo, or how Ad set up his bass for a specific take, or that Dave para diddled when he should have para dummed. That's a matter for the lads to tell you their side of the story if they ever feel so inclined. All I can say is that they are a fantastically talented group of musicians that I am proud to play with, and more importantly I am extremely proud to have co written and recorded this album with.
However it seems the group, who moved in on Tuesday afternoon, have taken advantage of a weak link in the security measures and have now set up camp on the grass and are less then 30 feet away from the entrance to the popular Outdoor Pool.
It’s OK if people I meet think I’m totally random. It’s OK if they think I’m arbitrary. It’s OK if they think I’m mean. I am actually trying very hard to be the exact opposite of all these things. I am being very intentional in what I do and what I ask my children to do. I am very methodical and plan things out in advance. And I do try to be nice. Yes, I know sometimes I raise my voice, and I am not perfect. But what seems mean to you might seem perfectly normal to them. You haven’t seen where my children have come from, where they’re headed, or what issues we’re having to deal with. Which means that much of the time you’re not going to understand the way I interact with them. And I’m fine with that. So fine with it that I’m not going to explain myself. I’ll just smile at you and act like all those things you see as weird or strange that I’m doing right in front of you are perfectly normal.
When we moved to this house in 2005, I set up these bulletin boards.
…Up to us to say.
I think most people in the industry feel the same way to some degree – and authors will certainly know what I’m talking about. When you work on a manuscript for a long time it feels like you’ve poured a lot of yourself into it. You’ve got to know the characters and the plot so well you dream about them. You can’t help but think of it as yours.
“Mukraker” will be formally released as part of a split 7″ single with fellow Brooklyn outfit, Illuminator, and it will also be available on their Bandcamp page on 2 Jan.
The flavors all worked – slight sweet squash with earthy mushrooms and slightly-salted cheese. But the pasta wasn’t coated enough. Next time I would add more cooking liquid. This dish would gain a valuable boost from bacon. The squash makes it, though you could substitute other veggies, specifically leafy greens, for the mushrooms – Swiss chard and spinach come to mind.
Business/Work/Formal Wear: Depending on your role and work context you may need some suits. Most men look good in a properly fitting suit so if you don’t currently wear one give it some thought. You will occasionally have the formal event you need to attend: wedding, court appearance, graduation, Ascot race day, etc. And of course you may occasionally wear a suit for the hell of it, ‘cause you actually feel like it!! Remember the mantra that you should dress not merely for the job you have but also for the job that you hope to do next. For those who wear suits regularly a well appointed wardrobe will include suits in a range of colours and textures. A very well appointed gentleman’s wardrobe might include suits of lighter fabric (and colour) for summer and heavier (and darker) fabric for winter.
Some people will rally around tradition and bemona its departure as a shame. They will yell but cutting it from school will makes lost art. Yeah, so is churning your own butter, but I don't see you getting up at 4 AM to milk Betsy.
Never pass up the opportunity to tell your kids you love them :0)
You thought of me
Since he’s been in business, in addition to the legal battles and verbal abuse, King’s company has been vandalized and threatened on numerous occasions.
But I digress (as I often do, I suspect its a habit when writing about one's passions).
I haven’t heard anything back yet, but I am sure MPs will want to lead by example. Wont they?
It sounds like a cheesy but fun event. I wonder what the significance is, if any, of July 10.
The crowds went home and left the streets without a soul to see,
Tomorrow: What exactly is the menu, and if you are so ordinary, why are you a food snob? And...Homemade Noodles for regular folk.
Every wedding is unique and different.
well, apparently some people like the way i do my hair
Skiing and Snowboarding
Take a stand and say no to others telling you no. If your book is finished, you have the freedom to get it out there now on your own terms as an ebook. Express yourself."
him that makes him stay.That force is called intimacy, which means he is “into me.”
Missouri Wrestling Revival is proud that Trevor Murdock has agreed to take part in the MWR Trading card set.
The following weekend, our wonderful friends and family helped us load up an enormous truck and move into our new home. Everything worked out!
She is up in the small pen so she stays quiet and I am hand walking her a couple times a day.
1 payment
3. Who wants to win a raffle basket with nearly $500 in gift cards and a limo ride to a night out on the town? Just come to our bunco 4 a cure, and it might just be YOU!!!
Edmondson: I think that’s right. There obviously are similarities… you know, its a hotel (laughs). He treated guests badly and so do we. But he didn’t ever catch anyone’s nipple ring on a fishing rod.
When we let go of the past with love, as oppose to anger; it clears our spirit of ties to the past and makes way for new love to enter our lives.
You pursue your dream for years on end and then finally achieve it, right? And then your dream becomes your “job”… Do you still have fun doing whatever it was that you loved before? Hmmm… We humans are just hopeless, aren’t we?
Yesterday, after viewing Tron: Legacy (which I happily give 3 stars for not being nearly as bad as I expected) I visited my old house of bliss, Borders. There I found two things. Firstly: "Song of Solomon" by Toni Morrison, which I have been searching for, in 4 book shops, for 4 days now, for the Op(scathe)rah's Book Club challenge. Unbelievable. I can't believe a book which has had multiple reprints since it's first publication in 1977, of which there are over 1,000 2nd hand copies available on Amazon.com for just 1c ea, which featured as an Oprah's Book Club selection, AND which, *drum roll* won the 1993 Nobel Prize in Literature, is so hard to find here in Australia. But alas, "Song of Solomon" was $30.99 brand new at Borders, and if I shell out that sort of money for every Oprah selection this year I will be... over 2 grand out of pocket. So I shall keep hunting for an alternative, even if the added time sets me back further in the challenge.
the perfect sets for my mom!
My outfit: Clicky the picky for any details.
Had an immobilier come to visit. “Can you claim on the insurance?” he asked. ‘Not with ours!’ I thought!
Our little monkeys nursery :)
7) When Church Becomes a Verb Instead of going to church to be fed, to be welcomed, to be loved, why don’t we go to church to feed, to welcome, to love?
Once you have completed your list, it’s time to put it all together by deciding. Here are some things you need to consider:
I am not sure what I think.
Really the most impressive part of the beer is the label. It totally captures that New Orleans feel with the typeface choice, piano keys and jazz singer silhouette.
Nazareth
Your knife delves
Cristiano Ronaldo stepped up first for Madrid and the German keeper, Manuel Neuer dove to his right and saved the kick. After Bayern scored the second goal, Kaka stepped up to take his penalty. He also kicked it towards Neuer’s right hand side; the keeper saved that penalty as well. Toni Kroos and captain Philipp Lahm then missed their kicks for Bayern and Xabi Alonso pulled one back for Real but Sergio Ramos blasted his effort high into the stands (at least 30 rows).
Disputes were also carried to the song’s title. McCartney stated that the title was inspired by “a British Railways ticket to the town of Ryde on the Isle of Wight,” which has been today’s consensus. However, Don Short, a journalist who traveled with The Beatles during the 1960′s, claimed Lennon said it came from, “cards indicating a clean bill of health carried by Hamburg prostitutes in the 1960s.” Short also added, ” John could of been joking – you had to be careful with him like that.”
By the time we finally physically connected I was feeling a little loss. My 'voices' returned, and although I was able to argue with them a bit, they did wear me down. When Master and I were first starting on our voyage, when I was feeling very insecure about something, I would wake up in the middle of the night and converse with the voices. That usually ended up in my sending Master an e-mail in the middle of the night, hoping that would help me get back to sleep...and writing about certain things in the middle of the night, was a LOT easier than talking about them in the light of day. No, I did not send am email, but I could feel myself starting to withdraw and did consider picking up a stone or two to re-build some walls.
I had some difficulty choosing one song in particular from this album because it really captures something as a whole, but “Caves Of Paradise” was one that floated to the top. What I find curious about this track, and many other ones on R.I.P., is that Cunningham’s production style has undergone a serious shift. On his 2009 album Splazsh, the production and timing on those tracks was flawless to the point of seeming almost mechanical in nature. Beats and textures would fluctuate and push the tracks forward, but the overall structure of the songs unfolded with clock like precision. Yet “Caves of Paradise”, and the rest of R.I.P., sound alive, a curious choice for an album that one can only assume is meant to grapple with death.
¡Feliz Navidad!
So, until next time I must craft or die.
Morz est li quens, que plus ne se demuret.
How cool is that? Give the bird to someone you don't even know and there's a good chance you can make a few bucks off of them.
1 non-physical
My girlfriend and another friend went to check it out, but they both brought 15 points of models. I played a few rounds with my friend during the tourneys lunch break to show him the strings. He enjoyed it and loved the tourney, specially the fun environment all around, which is completely normal for Warmachine events compared to other games. My gf got there to see my last battle and after that the Cryx player offered to play a lil game against her “battlebox” 15 points (see pink Khador army in the gallery). Of course it was over in 2 rounds even with a scenario. The Cryx list was insane (for tourney of course) with eSkarre, Deathjack, Bane Thralls and some crazy ass solo. But the point was that she got to play with someone who isn’t me, and got her ass kicked by hated Cryx (and a great player… and a crazy ass list… and…) so I was a lot of fun either way.
Insert boilerplate libertarian disclaimer about how government shouldn’t be in the business of sanctioning relationships in the first place. That's cute and everything, and I can see how you'd reach that conclusion if you take libertarianism to its absurd conclusion, but in a liberal society, the government does what the people wants it to do, and people want marriages to be legally recognized.
Perhaps you are already familiar with this insidious disposition. Did I say insidious? How can comfort be insidious?
In Exodus 12 v 31- 36 when the fire of God fell in the land of Egypt, Pharaoh sent for Moses in hurry, the one who had said “who is your God, I don’t know him and I am not going to let you go”, now said, go quickly, go and worship your God and bless me also. I can see Moses saying, I thought saying you don’t know my God and you are now asking my God to bless you. All those who have been asking where is your God? you will laugh last over them.
3. Books. I am really enjoying reading Cold Light by Frank Moorhouse (very slowly). Yet my most amazing moment with books happened earlier this year. I had just finished reading a novel and found a picture that looked exactly as I thought the main character might look. I emailed the picture to my sister who knows the author and passed it on. The author wrote back to say yes that is her, without the glasses. If only I had a hotline to authors of other books I read to check I am on the right track.
What is PROWL about?
That Dream was in
To digress onto the topic of Savanah for a moment, she is doing GREAT! With Doug not riding she only gets ridden two or three times a week, often bareback and often just for fifteen minutes or so. Yet she's the one who has really made great progress this summer. She is now consistent, solid and precise in all level one movements, and she wasn't at the beginning of the summer. Even with this limited amount of riding I wouldn't hesitate to take her into a show tomorrow in any level one test and I'm sure she'd do well. After riding her the other day I realized how far Rogo is from this. He can do all of the movements, some quite well, but he doesn't have her precision, especially with his circles or a good trot lengthening and shortening. If Doug isn't showing in the spring I'm going to start competing her again.
‘All the churches have set up a clergy furnished with knowledge and power, though this is contrary to evangelical thinking, as was initially realized when the clergy were called ministers, ministerium being service and the minister a servant of others.’
In Part 1, I have argued that Marx and Engels, basing themselves on their understanding of the workings of the Capitalist Economy, and their experience of working-class struggles, identified not only that Trade Union struggle could provide no real solution for workers' problems, but explained why that was the case. It was rooted in the fact that workers did not own property, and with only their Labour-Power to sell, Capital would always have the whip hand. Wages would rise and fall in line with the demand for Labour-power, and Capital Accumulation determined what that demand would be. If Capital decided its return was inadequate, it would reduce accumulation, wages would fall. And if Capital Accumulation was rapid, it would be the demand for Labour that would push up wages not Trade Union action. The answer could only be for workers themselves to become the owners of their means of production by the establishment of worker owned producer Co-operatives.
01-Heroes
So as they begin their journey from point A to point B, there will be problems besides basic survival and creature encounters. There will be backstabbing. There will be invoked complications. There will be personal attacks.
*Check out videos/dvds and audiocassetes/cds from your local library on whatever topic you are studying. Use the video time to break up a monotonous week or time in the car to listen to a book you might not have time to read aloud at home.
Despite the fact that Korea is 1/3 the size of Oman, the population in Korea is almost 49 million compared to 3 million in Oman! Where the median age in Korea is 39.8 years, the median age in Oman is 22.4 years. Where Muscat, the capital of Oman, has a population of 634,000, the population in Seoul, the capital of South Korea, is nearly 10 million.
Flamethrower
I think that I will post my other adventures separately so that I can get into at least a little detail. It's been so long now that that may not be the simplest thing to do, but it's all good in the end.
@ 9:30am
If you have watched Masterchef you would have witnessed how it doesn't hurt any less as an adult as it did as a child to be standing there last when you are automatically delegated to the remaining side. It's a kick in the guts- no two ways about it!
My friend Scott Derrick was quite a character. He had kind, joyful, and sarcastically-playful way about him. We met at a birthday party for a mutual friend (way back in 1974), and we hit it off well.
5. Sun Harvest popcorn or kettle corn, .99/ea. at Sun Harvest (through 3/30/11)
Yep, I got all high-minded with this shit.
What do you need? I would ask her. But I couldn’t ask her that.
me realise there
She accepts that such things simply happen.
determine by May 15, 2012, whether or not they would sign. In light of these
All right, that was way more than seven (making up in self-revelation what I’m lacking in blog following), and I’m moving on to Versatile Blogger Nominations (in no particular order):
Will the branch
So maybe you’re thinking about returning to exercise after birth, or perhaps you are already attending one of my fitness or Pilates classes with your new baby, or you’re already attending the gym. Whatever your circumstances, you’ve heard me mention previously, that before you embark on exercise after birth there are a few things to consider.
RESPONSORIUM
And after about eight hours of motoring, we found our home for the night. R and S were definitely ready to get off the boat and play. There was just enough beach there for them to be able to throw rocks. :)
Another retreat challenge that I set was the Something Old, Something New, Something Borrowed, Something Blue challenge, and here's my take on it.
Modern Love's loaded gun.
My Outlook for 2012.
Someone Else Can’t Do It For You
My knowledge of classical music is limited, but I enjoy listening to different interpretations of Chopin's piano works. Guiomar Novaes is a well-regarded pianist, but her recording of Chopin's waltzes is not on CD. I don't know who makes these decisions or how they are decided, but it seems anyone with an interest in classical music would have to have a turntable to hear the majority of classical recordings.
During the discussion, Attorney General Shurtleff brought up identity theft. Chief Burbank continued on the subject and began laughing when discussing where identities were sold (apparently he knows which “corner store”) and notes the people in the crowd know where this is occurring. He then talks about how something should be done going so far as to excuse the stolen/fraudulent ID purchases sending the message that he will do nothing about it. The preceding discussion was about federal responsibility to enforce immigration law and Chief Burbank wants the federal government to “go after that person” selling the documents. Evidently, while not immigration enforcement, Chief Burbank prefers to yuk it up rather than do anything about a crime that involves real victims including tens of thousands of Utah children.
It made me snicker, of course. And I had to see what it was all about.
It needs some serious help.
From sin’s tremendous curse and blame.
Yuval Who? We asked the same thing.
Actually I should rephrase that. I think I would first have loved it aged seventeen. I'm 44 now, and loved it anyway. When I bought it, I thought I'd pass it on to my kids. My older son (now 15) might like it in couple of years time (though there are no battling Romans or exploding orcs in it, so his tastes will need to broaden first). My younger son (now 12) is definitely too young for some of the themes.
3) The races were really not that exciting and certainly not worth getting up so early!! From where we were standing the boats were racing directly towards us, so it was impossible to really see who was in the lead or if the race was even close.
And right here I have to say- if you are a mama who has gone through that- my hat is off to you. One tiny little tube surgery made this mama a near wreck for two weeks. I cannot imagine what it's like to hand your baby over to someone, knowing her life is in their hands, and not knowing if you were going to see her alive again. You mamas are my heroes, and I am so sorry if I've never conveyed that here before. I hope we never have to go through anything more than tubes with Lily, and my admiration for all of you just went through the roof this morning.
No, Hannah decided, Sam didn’t fit for her. Not really. Maybe Laverne would have been a good choice, but not as long as he was Mary’s choice. Hannah supposed even now that Laverne and Mary would soon be dating.
Rosie: Dozens of people, all over the world. In the last week, alone, we’ve had hits from 19 countries, including Sweden, Singapore, Syris, India, Barbados–
Luckily, Sherri Hill dresses are available for order online. You can find these fun, bold, and flirty dresses in almost any style, and be certain that you are at the height of fashion whenever you slip into it. Sherri Hill dresses are available in so many different colors and cuts that you would be certain to find exactly what you are looking for, and by ordering online, you could have your new dress delivered directly to your home. Best of all, by choosing from the wide array available online, you are less likely to choose a dress that someone else at the same function will be wearing.
Median income, when adjusted for inflation, is lower. Many middle-class blacks have fled in search of safer neighborhoods and better schools.
Tip #1 Choose organic popcorn which means no pesticide residues. Non-organic or regular popcorn was listed on the FDA’s top ten of the most commonly contaminated foods with pesticides and chemicals.
But if I go and see unrealistic “love” stories it is quite possible that I can try to apply what I saw in the movie to real life scenarios with the opposite sex. And this is what a lot of MEN are doing to their own chagrin. What I am saying is when people become engulfed in too many romantic Hollywood movies, their ideals of love, relationships, men and women become unrealistic and they try to apply those same techniques or principles in real life when it comes to relationships with the opposite sex. What they will ultimately find is that what the Hollywood screenwriter wrote and what the Hollywood director displayed on film is usually NOT the best route for the average guy and/or is usually the surest way for a guy to be friend zoned or seen as damn near creepy OR a damn fool.
It turns out that when the casino fire alarm goes off, the vents in McDonald's close, so all the smoke from their fryers was blowing into the casino. This resulted in McDonald's being unable to fry things until they got the vents open.
Shrugging, “Oh, that? That was nothing.”
I made these for a recent Summer card front swap on my favorite MB. I LOVE how they turned out!!! If I remember correctly I used more mustard, pumpkin pie and Cajun craze to create the sky and sea and early espresso to create the mountains. I added some details in the pcean with my white Signo pen. Then finished the fronts off by adding them to Basic Black cardstock and added the little tabs which are made with my window label punch, and attached with brads. The sentiment is punched out also with the word window and matted onto the Modern Label punch. I stamped the "Sanded" background stamped onto the now retired Dusty Durango cardstock base.
This weeks issue comes with stationary set including Ruler, notepad and more…
So that's where I am - in the midst of house selling madness, sitting through day number 23 on the market and hoping a little price drop will make my dream of home selling success a reality. I just want it sold and able to move on to smaller commutes, a gym in my building and the joy that the next time I reno, it will be all for me.
10. Did you ever make prank phone calls?
Tuesday: Bathrooms
Alice
We have already seen, from the simplest expression of value, x commodity = y commodity B, that the thing in which the magnitude of the value of another thing is represented seems to have the equivalent form independently of this relation, as a property which it possesses by nature. We followed the process by which this false semblance solidified itself. This process was completed when the universal equivalent form become identified with the natural form of a particular commodity, and thus crystallized into the money form. Although a particular commodity only becomes money because all other commodities express their value in it, it seems on the contrary, that all other commodities universally express their values in a particular commodity because it is money. The movement which mediated this process vanishes in its own result, leaving no trace behind. Without having to do anything to achieve it, the commodities find the form of their own value, in its finished shape, in the body of a commodity existing outside and alongside them. This physical object, gold or silver in its crude state, becomes, as soon as it emerges from the bowels of the earth, the immediate incarnation of all human labor. Hence the magic of money. The merely atomistic behavior of men in their social process of production, and hence the fact that their own relations of production take on an objectified form independent of their conscious individual striving, manifests themselves at first in the fact that the products of labour generally take the form of commodities. The riddle of the money fetish is therefore merely the riddle of the commodity fetish, which has become visible and blinding the eyes. 187:1
P.S. If you don't like this one, just wait. I've got one coming out soon about my clit. I'm not kidding. And men, you better know where it is. Not mine, specifically. But as a general rule, you ought to know your way around your lady's private parts. WE WILL DRAW YOU A MAP IF NECESSARY. And Jesus Christ, is it necessary for some of you.
Now, when we arrive he wants to introduce me to the world of LARP'ing. "What the hell is that?" I asked. "It doesn't even sound normal."
“It’s no surprise why people often feel ill around fragrances,” says Stacy Malkans, co-founder of the Campaign for Safe Cosmetics, another organization authoring the report. “They spray the stores down both inside the stores and outside the stores, without any notification or consent from people.”
Step 11) The corner needed a little something, so I stamped these holly leaves on white card stock in Memento Tuxedo Black. The stamp is from a $ bin set at Michaels. I colored the leaves with Copic BG78 and the berries with R27.
I'm happy we have such a happy baby (for the most part)
Shadows in the dark. People with no face and name. People who get something to eat when the supermarkets lights are out. And the waste is taken to the streets.
Do you think Stéphane Bonnes is a Celtic legend?
However, there are some hardy folks whom we are grateful for because they keep their shops open all year long.
This entry was originally posted on November 3, 2003.
If she wanted
Fuhrman told the judge she believes Delray Police are reviewing WalMart security tapes to see if weights may have been purchased there – weights presumably to sink bodies. “It’s the beginning of a very intense criminal investigation,” Fuhrman said.
Went to visit Ma later in the evening, she also had a great night out on Friday, got home at 3A.M! (Later than me.) :¬)
Jane Austen did not blather. Her chief concern was telling a story. Her words (and scenes) just fit – not only in meaning, but sound, syntax, imagery – all of it – like they were destined for each other. They seem so right in their construction that to cut out anything she wrote would be tragic, like losing a family member at Disneyland. There’s nothing superfluous or unnecessary (Tom Bombadil anyone?) and to add anything would just be awkward, like having said family member attached to your back at all times. (Yes, I misplaced my little cousin at the happiest place on Earth. ONCE.)
I like how she has put it "I am asking for your help to swamp Susan with Cards sent from the Heart"
I’ve got a job lined up for the summer and am trying to get enrolled in a summer course at a local community college. Unfortunately I waited until the last second to register and I didn’t realize until today how many things needed to be done for that.
This year is going to be the year that things change for me.
Props to designer Mark Zunino for designing the sexy, strapless red column dress that QVC host Lisa Robertson wore Friday night for the network’s “Live From the Red Carpet” event out in Beverly Hills. The dress looked like it was painted on Robertson, and the whole look reminded of Jessica Rabbit.
NMDPS Concealed Carry Unit
Learn things and get smart. –Geppetto (Pinocchio)
This time rather than hurl myself into the market I tried a limit order for WSD short at 10400. Certainly at first appearance a better way of doint things
Smallest snowflake also from Winter Woodland cut at 1.75"
my mom’s cooking
The kids love playing this game. They think it's a lot of fun to tilt and blast their way through bombs and obstacles.
“Alright, hold on, I’m gonna go get the backpack and then we’ll head out.”
...we might be back (touch wood)
While many students may head off to university with little more than a kettle and a fork, a Biba spokesman suggests that contents insurance is important to protect the luxuries they take with them.
Awaiting you while you followed him
Livesey applied the Page 69 Test to The Flight of Gemma Hardy, her latest novel, and reported the following:On p. 69 of Jane Eyre, Jane, who has become a teacher at Lowood School, advertises for a situation as a governess which of course leads to her going to Thornfield Hall and meeting Mr. Rochester.
“Myriam Nonaka, an electrical engineering student at the Universidad Tecnológica Nacional in Buenos Aires, Argentina, finds 6.002x to be “very entertaining,” and singles out the course’s online discussion forum as a place “where you can share and learn.”
These were no “educated guesses” from Camping’s point of view. Nor from his loyal followers’ point of view. As he put it on his website, “…these dates are 100% accurate and beyond dispute.” And as he told numerous interviewers, “The Bible guarantees it.”
A five day delay – A very tight schedule now but still doable.
Places I would like to visit: Morocco, Jerusalem, Argentina, Chile.
"Asian markets used to be supplied by Asian species. Those are now gone and Asia has turned to Africa," he said.
So how is the public to know they’re reading garbage? Just throw in a vampire or a ghost or a serial killer or a few sex scenes and that’s enough to find an audience. And the agents and publishers know this. Don’t blame Amazon or anyone else, blame US.
- I have worked for Wickham Farms in Penfield for the past several years. I'm currently their director of marketing. Wickham Farms is starting a CSA this year, which excites me to no end. Among my duties is writing the blog for the CSA, which is here.
After a flight over that unbounded wilderness, sleepy Cedar Key looks to the relieved pilot like a metropolitan oasis. Flying at pattern altitude over Dock Street on the south end of town alerts Judy Mason, Cedar Key’s lone taxi driver, to the arrival of a fare; incoming pilots can also hail her on the published unicom frequency. You approach the airport’s paved 2,355-foot runway (lighted from dusk to dawn — beware the black-hole approach over water) from either the northeast or southwest and tie down on a small ramp on the south end of the taxiway. (Bringing your own tiedown ropes isn’t a bad idea.) Try to remember to fly the airplane while you’re enjoying the view — saltwater submersion negatively impacts most airframes (even rentals).
I suspect that not everyone is being made aware of The Ropes, what they entail or even, possibly, that they exist.
I hope you understand why I did it. I hope you know that I had nothing but the best intentions, that I wanted to record it all somehow, before it was gone forever.
More than 10,000 people usually visit
It was an opportunity to experience
There are, of course, regional differences in face shapes, colours and features.
From the 16th century, St Mary's was the base for the growth of a local type of administration - the select vestry of St Mary's Parish Church, known as the four-and-twenty. As its name suggests, this select vestry comprised twenty- four of the leading inhabitants of Gateshead. They were self-co-opting; not elected by the parishioners and they effectively controlled those aspects of local government - for example the care of the poor and the maintenance of the highways - which government legislation had made a parish responsibility. The minute books of the four-and-twenty survive from 1626, when the body was already well established.
I try to have a good relationship with my patients. Many due to the nature of their disease processes or medications I see monthly. So the short term hospitalization full of bad mouthing does not usually do much but cause people to doubt the care they are receiving in hospitalization. Show pride in yourself, and not bad mouth others.
salt + freshly ground pepper
Why should it always be drama in situations like this? Just because Colby and I used to date doesn't mean that it has to be weird with Morghen and me, or that the two of us shouldn't be friends. It just means we are mature enough to overcome pettiness and appreciate that life does not have to be black and white. If you are fortunate enough to find in life a friend that you treasure, don't let petty things hinder you from truly enjoying that person and the friendship that you have.
* The puppies were due this week on Wednesday or Thursday but on Monday evening I got a text from Paige saying:'Go, go, go!'. So the kids and me got our bags (already packed and ready to go) and headed off to Paige's. (for those who don't know, my dog Oakley is the puppy daddy). Bella had had her show and was very restless and P and me waited up with her. Her waters broke at 1.30am so we decided to wait up some more. Nothing happened all night (except us getting very tired)or the whole of the next day! We spent the day watching films, laying around on the sofas and waiting patiently. Tuesday night Bella was rucking up all the newspaper in the whelping box (a sure sign) but still nothing was happening so we decided to try and get some sleep on the sofas. About half an hour later P saw that Bella was contracting so we both went to sit in the kitchen with her. The first puppy was born at 1.17am, with very little fuss from Bella considering this is her first litter. I must admit to crying a little bit when I saw the first pup born as this was a new experience for me and it was wonderful!
now therefore
Process notes: just a tad behind in organizing ‘these’ precious gems – basically just rearranged the boxes. Well I guess that is step one…
We used to have this one customer who would sit at the bar by himself while eating his salad and drinking his beer while listening to headphones. Sure, he was a little odd, but he always seemed to keep to himself and pay his tab. That is until he started having his girlfriend join him at the bar. Whenever these two would come in together, they would always fight and cause a scene. One of the last times these two came into the bar, they not only got into a fight, but the woman stormed out of the restaurant. The guy announced that he would not be paying for the tab. We pointed out to him that he was essentially stealing from the restaurant and that he was not allowed to come back.
RachelYeomans Oh boy let’s see – Facebook insights, Google analytics, Twitter (of course!) – just started using TwentyFeet and love it!
Now all we hear are bollywood numbers , the local flavor is lost forever at least in big cities like Delhi. In the Mugal times also Holi was played with fervor and gaiety. India’s cultural heritage has been enriched by the harmonious amalgamation and assimilation of various faiths and ethnicities.
masterfully shape-shifts
No new prescriptions. Not only that, they wanted to tell me how impressed they were with me. They don't get patients in here like me often, they said, and they thought it was very important to make sure I knew just how unique it really was. They didn't have to do that, because we all knew it. All you had to do is look around the unit. During our discussions, an extremely obese man in the room next door was arguing with a nurse about why he could not have hot dogs for lunch.
Daddy was a pretty good sport, he stayed for maybe 30 mins.
This is a close up of the cute little image. Nestabilities oval die are used to cut the image and mat. Embossed the image while it is still in the die to give a great finish.. Tumbled Glass and Broken China Distress ink are sponged around the die. Start off the paper and lightly sponge toward your image. I lightly sketched some circles and colored them to look like bubbles.
Created by Len Bentham / Happy Holidays
Trying to listen to the BBC F1 coverage where they promised un interrupted coverage.
1 1/2 cups all-purpose flour
My parents were my friends with whom I could share anything under the sun. I guess this respect for growth and freedom has made me a better mother.
Check for seasoning (I think liberal amounts of black pepper always needed, salt depends on your sausage's salt levels), squeeze lemon juice over top - serve with some crusty bread to mop up those beery/buttery/paprika-y juices!
Surprise!: DE, Nick Perry
We were all pleasantly surprised at how much fun this field trip was.
So, for those parents whose concern is drinking regularly? And being a dutiful child? This website is for them.
I don't know. I just . . . don't know. Not a good night, I guess.
I decided to join in on the virtual marathon. I think it will be a fun one. I chose to do the full marathon. You have 2 weeks to complete the marathon...I think that's doable!
On her second turn she kinda freaked out, Widowmaker couldn’t shoot because of the fleeing status. She didn’t even pop her feat to try and freeze Torch (eSorscha and the bonded Destroyer are both immune to cold). This was perhaps the biggest mistake in the game, because she could still try and do something with her caster and a crippled Juggernaut. The jack had his right arm (big ass ice axe) crippled so he really didn’t do much to Torch. And because he ended his activation 2 inches away from the bonded Destroyer, he got frozen.
I'm overworked.
My dad’s favourite chart song in the mid-70s was Heart of the Union by The Strawbs. He took it at face value as a pro-union singalong though we know now The Strawbs were taking the piss out of working class union members and their sheep-like adherence to a movement which had outlasted its relevance in the modern world which was fast approaching its Monetarist nightmare.
the fighting reputation we used to
I am betting that this is coming. I believe that more workplaces will add fun to their corporate culture. It's a way to draw in and retain good employees. People will be happier at work, therefore healthier and more productive, more creative and dedicated to the company's mission. Not just picking up a paycheck.
Wishing you all many many thanks for your lovely comments thru our travels, I hope you all are having a wonderful week!!
Collar:
This was what I paired the Bruschetta chicken with. I am always looking for a great pasta salad recipe and this one seemed to come out very well...my family let me know this :) It is a very fresh looking salad so it would look be a great dish to take to a cookout in the spring or summer. Good anytime of the year though. The colder it is, the better it tastes!
The bees, hungry for the watermelon, swarm the flesh-bit pairing knife.
We all know the story of Abraham being asked to sacrifice his only son Isaac to God (found in Genesis 22, in case you forgot). And I would bet that most of us think that is probably a pretty grand thing. Something HUGE and out of the ordinary. But really the act of giving sacrifices was fairly common or ordinary for Abraham and by extension Isaac had grown up knowing that at various times and seasons and on certain days he and his father would go and offer up sacrifices. It was a common act for them.
SANTORUM: Because we need to have as much money funneling through this economy as possible. And the people who make those investments are people who have resources and wealth, and we want them to deploy that wealth in the most productive way possible.
I really enjoyed the Willis Brothers cover as I am a big fan of the Willis Brothers and their trucker songs, "Diesel Fuel" is kind of surf rockish, kind of reminds of Deadbolt in a strange way. "Rig Rock" is just a good old fashion rock n' roll song.
Winning Poker Hand: You have two Marines. Keep them.
Jesus answered, “Everyone who drinks this water will be thirsty again,but whoever drinks the water I give him will never thirst. Indeed, the water I give him will become in him a spring of water welling up to eternal life.” John 4:13-14
Multi Testing Mommy asked if I could post a sample menu of what I eat day to day. This has developed over the last few weeks and seems to be working for me.
I started a segment called 'Green is the New Pink' a few weeks back and I apologize for not updating more often! I have things in mind, I just stumble with the whole implementation step. The idea behind 'Green is the New Pink' is that you don't have to be a stereotypical tree-hugger to be green. We can all make small steps, as stated above to "reduce our environmental footprint." All of the above steps can be taken with little to no expense to you! Granted, some may not be relevant to your area, but if you research enough, maybe there's something you can do to start it!
We like our TV around here. However, my Hubby is quite adamant about no TV in bedrooms and by and large I think that's a good idea - except when I don't want to watch what everyone else is watching.
I was hoping to hold out on washing it until Saturday but I may end up having to wash it tomorrow morning. Either that or it will go into a ponytail tomorrow. I'm planning on sticking with washing it 2x per week but will judge it based on the condition of my roots on a daily basis.
Maloles Miracosta is the favoured designer of fans of luxury pumps, wedge sandals and feminine heels who don't take themselves too seriously. The Spanish-born designer, previously a fashion writer for Elle and Vogue, took the plunge and launched her very own brand of shoes in Paris in 2004. The 'Zoé' pump has been a must-have piece for all self-respecting shoe-aholics since 2005. Maloles introduces humour into her designs while paying unerring attention to even the tiniest of details. All her shoes are manufactured in Alicante, Spain, and sold in high-class boutiques in London, New York and Paris. Six thousand pairs were sold in the summer of 2006 alone — making Maloles a force to be reckoned with in the fashion world.
Here is what I really want people to know: If I touch the letters I think and I hope that people will be touched by them. I’m a secular Jew and I know this story almost by heart because I’ve heard it every year since I was born, 39 years ago. If we designers are involved with what we do, it’s likely that our audiences will get involved with it too. For years I have been claiming that the real question about typography is not ‘how does it look?’ but ‘how does it behave?’
Extra pen stylus
Thank you so much, Rachel, for your kind words and for being here today!
‘Don’t be ridiculous,’ he chides himself, ‘think of the admin.’
No jackets this month, just two cardigans:
Not only that Amy was also envious that the principal playing up favorite to Elizabeth simply because he knows what Elizabeth knows about him as well as what he likes.
My spirit is quieted, and my eyes are wet like rain.
I’m pretty happy with how my training is going for the upcoming St Louis Half Marathon April 15. I still want to get a bit faster to run a sub-7 minute pace, but I have enough time to add more speed workouts.
At this point I knew for sure it was happening. I start crying. I start sweating. I look around in vain for a camera to get a picture of the boys. I think of freshening up, but I scratch that and just get my ass in the first cab I see, hoping he'll still want to marry my sweaty, blotchy-faced self.
This is a result of 420.
Having a child is not a RIGHT, it is a PRIVILEGE. It is a sacred gift from God that requires parents to fulfill that sacred trust. And there is a huge difference between being able to give birth to a child and being a parent. Our society must relearn this lesson.
Twit.
ISBN-10: 0768440483
I think the general picture of the Prime Minister living a lavish lifestyle and being an abuser of the public purse is pretty well established now. Many would say that she is merely following in Patrick Manning’s footsteps….or maybe this is an example of good family values….who knows.
They mosey around for a while exchanging some nonsensical dialogue and the scenes are transitioned horribly through schizophrenic drug induced hallucinations that look like stuff you’d see in a 1995 computer game. The whole thing is just too cluttered and claustrophobic, with short scenes broken up by tons of bright, flashy colors enough to give small Japanese children seizures. How am I supposed to be invested in this? It’s practically the cinematic equivalent of a hyperactive little girl on too much sugar!
Filling gaps and holes,
I will tell the truth, I am not the world’s greatest fan of poetry. While I appreciate a good poem, and especially loved learning about them in school, I don’t make a habit of picking up books of poetry to read. I enjoyed reading Emily’s poems, but I am unable to offer a great critical review of them myself.
The ladies of the group decided to take a walk to see Lake Surprise - a crater lake which has formed on Mount Eccles (volcanic). As we headed off, one of the girls spied a koala up in a gum tree - so cute - it was just sitting, watching us!
Supreme Court, there had been various news floating across the internet and print media arguing that win for Novartis could have a “devastating impact” on access of medicines in the developing world and would increase the drug pricing drastically. Also, the case has keenly been followed by pharmaceutical sector in India outcome of which could outline the future of Indian pharmaceutical industry. In short, the Glivec dispute brought multifaceted debates in India (even across the border) but in this post we will try focusing more on facts rather
Is everything crystal clear? No, not remotely.
Eli is in love with Peppa Pig. He wants to watch it all the time. We now have our one DVD loaded on the iPod, iPhone and iPad. I can keep him still and quiet anywhere. Anyway, he (or maybe me…) decided it would be a fun theme for his party. However, seeing how we live in Australia and not the UK it proved difficult getting my hands on anything Peppa Pig related. I couldn’t even find much on my go to place for ideas, Pinterest. So I had to use my creative license in coming up with ideas for the food. We had:
Stir in the cacao powder, ground almonds, baking powder and salt.
1 1/2 cups brown rice, uncooked
Angelia
Top Gun Screen Tests
I continue to trust in the Lord Jesus Christ to guide and direct me. That is why any comments I make are always about my praying for the person posting, whether they are believers or not, WE all have special needs and God can make those needs His priority. We just need to walk next to Him.
Six or seven years ago E@L would have ripped this article to shreds or at least rewritten it, emphasizing the negative aspects of the Singapore attributes that have been given a jocularly positive spin in this article.
If you are hosting a children's book giveaway, or if you found a giveaway somewhere on the net that you just have to share, I'd love to have you share your links with us here on our weekly giveaway linky so that we can all stop by and enter.
In 2008, Lord Feldman was appointed chief executive of the Tory Party and was given specific responsibility for attracting party donors. Yet he blundered in the summer of 2009.
Or, I can get a studio apartment in an old hotel
We decided brownies as one of our items this year, as it was much easier to make and the baking time for a tray is shorter. We reckon that brownies would not be a good breakfast item, hence our alternative item was sandwiches. As there were other stalls selling sandwiches as well, Huiqin came up with this pizza bread. Althought the taste was good, it would have turned cold by the time we reached the office. A few sample tries for our colleagues indicated that it was not a very welcoming item on the menu.
Remember this when you blast out without thinking. You can end up being your own worse enemy.
He reached to bring the damp cloth against the back of Dora's neck, but the back of his hand touched warm, invisible flesh under a thin skirt; Taslin's thigh. He jerked back, trying not to blush, and blinked Clearsight away. The Gift-Giver reappeared, regarding him with a mix of curiosity and amusement that reminded him all too much of Pevan's teasing.
One including working on another blog.
Amazing that a beautiful Ceramic Be...
At the end of the day, my take on Boys & Girls is that it was largely a sleeper of an album, not really amounting to its full potential, courtesy of lazy production and frustratingly sparse flashes of brilliance from such an acclaimed band. Howard is born to do this, bringing a welcome raw, emotive spark of stripped-back passion to the record and more or less covering the bases for the rest of the group when they don’t play up to snuff. But one great vocalist does not a great album make. Give this band time to grow into the exceedingly large shoes they’ve been asked to fill so quickly. They have the songwriting ability, and the inventive crossover style. Now they just need to hone their sound into a more cohesive being.
-Very happy it was rated R. It had a nice level of profanity and raunch to keep me liking it, as opposed to a PG-13 rom-com, which would usually make me want to tear my eyes out.
I'm a bit despondent right at this minute, to be honest.
But I wake up
Once we get out into the light, we are recognized and sent around the house to the front lawn. There we find Angus, on his side, unresponsive, our Zulu Dr and another Dr at his side. The heart monitor is already attached, a new drip running full speed. I ask the doctor for an update. He informs me that Angus collapsed, and glances at the monitor. One look and my worst fears are realized. The rhythm is very abnormal, with an Inverted “T” wave, typically found with a Heart Attack. I look at the Blood Pressure monitor – More bad news, it reads 80 / 40. The oxygen mask is already on, with all holes masked up to try and increase the concentration of Oxygen delivered to Angus. I have seen this many times before. I know what happens next.
As my favorite INTP, Albert Einstein once said: “Genius is 1% inspiration and 99% perspiration.” Ideas can only take you so far – ideas without action just hang, like an over-ripening fruit, and eventually fall to the ground, forgotten. And action can’t happen without nailing the details.
5. To help their growth, champions enlist the help of a coach or mentor. Mentors and coaches are gates to greatness. Isaac Newton said, “If I’ve seen any further I’ve done so by standing on the shoulder of giants.” Mentors and coaches are those ‘giants’ who by the benefit of their wisdom we can perform better than we would all by ourselves.
“I know some of us are not in Japan right now, and alot of us consider Japan our home away from home.
Can we go back in time?!
There are many holiday movies, and depending on where you are in life, each year a different film might appeal. This year, we were sitting around Christmas Eve when The Sound of Music came on.
Yet, in some sense, this is the bit of the dangerous time. It, in a sense, parallels the 70s, when realizing that protest was limited, people either moved to work within the system, such as by running for elected office, like Tom Hayden, or moved to act in more militant directions, a la the Weather Underground and Bill Ayers(now something of a mentor to Occupiers).
So……knowing we were hoping to find a new car, I told her we’d return the aforementioned truck to its very generous owners and send her back with one of ours for the week until we found something new.
I don’t know about you, but that last sentence sounds rather creepy yet totally intriguing. I don’t think I’ve ever ordered a book online, but for something that is such a big seller, I think I just might. I need to know what all the rage is about right? I consider it research for my blog. Apparently I’m not the only one who thinks so. Mommy Bloggers are apparently spreading word of these books like rapid fire. The Toronto Star reports-http://www.thestar.com/news/books/article/1144739–erotic-novel-for-women-fifty-shades-of-grey-gets-u-s-publisher
Years ago I asked a member of the Tupacamaristas what they wanted for the people of Peru. I was told: “We want to be able to grow and distribute our own food. We already know how to do that. We merely need to be allowed to do so.” There was no mention of green jobs.
HENRY B, NAUS M, STIRLING R. Impact of influenza vaccination policies on staff coverage in long-term care facilities. International Congress Series 2001; 1219: 671-675.
Speaking of Bethlehem, starting this May the NEW Historic District Farmer’s Market will begin at the Sun Inn Courtyard, right there downtown (walking distance, hey now!) on Thursdays from 11am-3pm. The Co-op will be around with an information table and helping the vendors if they need it.
Hi everybody. Sorry for my more prolonged absence from the Blog. I'm now back under this year's run of Chemotherapy, and still at work during the week. I had decided about 3 weeks back to answer a number of questions I have been receiving from you, with regards to my opinion of Brian Braddock's return to Marvel Comics in the pages of first Uncanny X-Force and then Secret Avengers. The plan had been an article on each, which would offer that. Unfortunately this proved somewhat overambitious for my energy levels at the time. So while I will be getting to those, as a prelude, I offer the following...
This edition of I Hear a New World focuses on stacks of wax that I have recently acquired from the fantastic record store called Exiled Records. Today's recipe features two slices of goodness from the Sublime Frequencies stable, a heaping helping of psych-jazz fusion, a spoonful of blues and a dash of fuzzy, afro-funk for extra flavor.
Lo and behold, it was him. He said a quick “hi” before stepping in. Then, like a ninja, I shot my arm out and blocked him from going any further.
Kim Yu Na doesn't break under pressure! She becomes a diamond under it and shines brilliantly, beautifully!
Using Michael Jackson just seemed to be more realistic for people to understand the seriousness of a person’s emotions. Parents need to understand that although they too have hopes and dreams and do not desire to live a certain lifestyle, that the day that they chose to become parents..things changed.
Sam proposed on Sunday and we are OVER THE MOON EXCITED!
Interesting side trips off the main road should include the 2-CD set, “27 Points” (1995)—a solid, mid-period live document—“Levitate” (1997) and “Unutterable” (2000). These last two studio releases have some strong moments and find M.E.S. changing the drum rhythms, leaving behind well-worn patterns and even allowing a few synthesizer parts into the tunes. It is reassuring to note that the 50-year-old Mark E. Smith hadn’t lost any bite with the band’s 2007 effort, “Reformation Post TLC,” or on “Imperial Wax Solvent” (2008). After 30-plus years of bringing his songs to life in recording studios, Smith is still a master at keeping things interesting. His success has always been based on not just taking the roads less traveled, but about following his personal muse, no matter what the consequences or where it might lead him.
92. Show your partner where you went to school as a kid
The walking club is part of the district’s Physical Education Program Grant to promote student activity. The program runs for four weeks, April 30 through May 25.
I had been craving baked Ziti. I wanted it to be rich and warm and oh so cheesy. And just like that my friend Carl posted a Baked Ziti recipe on his blog. What were the odds? So I gathered together the ingredients and told hubby I'd be making Ziti for dinner on Tueday night. He wasn't that enthused and said it sounded "weird." I told him it's like lasagna but the pasta is a different shape. (To say he isn't a culinary adventurer would be an understatement of gargantuan proportion')
I knew that one day he would have a military burial. It wasn’t at a military cemetery, we have a family cemetery in Florida… almost in Georgia. It’s at the old “Butler” place that’s been in my dads family for over 100 years.
Thanks for coming by~~XO
We work hard to find and deliver to you the latest in stamping and paper crafting supplies! Attending classes, workshops, and sales meetings around the world, our goal is to keep our product offerings fresh and current. Make us your one stop easy shop - and we'll deliver right to
The main reasons for that being:
I was saddened that I didn’t know most of the songs. I had just spent the past few weeks learning the Spine album really well, and was hoping they would play a lot of songs off of it. They only played 2.
So again, Jesus said that in his name “those who believe…when they drink deadly poison, it will not hurt them at all…”
1/4 freshly ground pepper
IN THE PRESENT TENSE, YOU MUST KNOW AND INCLUDE EVERY TINY DETAIL--there is no room for skipping forward. By placing the narrative in the immediate present, you're investing every moment and every breath with importance. Using past tense allows us to glibly skip forward and cut out of scenes easily once they have been milked for their interest. But in the present tense, you've already chosen the importance of, well, the present, which makes it much more difficult to escape artfully from the many boredoms that pad the interesting parts of our day-to-day life. This means that unless you are very, very skillful indeed, the format of your narrative may force you to include content that bores your audience, either directly or gradually.
By this I mean, I’m thankful to not be in the same miserable boat as a lot of my struggling peers.
One of the things that doing an Open University Creative Writing course teaches you is to critique others writing. After all reading others work and commenting on it is a great way to sharpen up your own writing - of course this is assuming that one's time is spent writing and not just reading! And so, a little while back, when one of my writer pals from the village encouraged me to join Newbooks magazine as a reviewer, I decided to use my new found skills and see if this was something for me.
I know I will feel the same when this wee baby joins us too.
The Anti-Defamation League (ADL) has a lot of really generic info on racially radial groups in the US. Not a big fan of them because they fail to cite any of the radical Jewish groups in the US (yes they exist) but once again, your tax dollars are helping to fund them so you might as well get some use out of it.
All up and down the Perth coastline it’s near impossible to not be able to find a good vantage point to watch the sunset. All along the coastal dual-use path, people walk, jog and run right along the waters edge. A very popular spot to the locals.
Next was a funky store called Mirador (yes, it rhymes and I wasn’t even trying). It’s also on Division Street (2106 SE Division St). It’s a delightful amalgam of incense, housewares, spiritual books, candles, postcards and skincare. The kind of store where you really need to slow your pace and look around. No speed shopping here. I saw a lot of interesting item but finally
Stamp - Fillable Frames #5, Matstack 3 Collection, PTI Anniversary Set
Predictably playing the "what about the children?" card, the original commenter responded:
Whether using the car seat in harness or booster mode, the color-coded belt guides help you secure it properly. A convenient recline system allows you to adjust the car seat to custom fit the backseat of your vehicle.
“I know what you are.” I could tell that his disgust was growing. He certainly liked repeating himself.
If you truly want to grow and learn in life, then these ARE important considerations.
And, sometimes that’s a bad thing. Especially when I am too close to a situation to see it clearly. Then, I go stumbling blindly along making all sorts of mistakes.
I said guys, I am not the enemy.
Does OTFT have an environmental philosophy as well?
My cute Christmas plates my Mom got me last year!! I was sooo excited to finally use them !!! Thanks MOM- I ♥ them!!
Love.
but Jesus can say it
“HE MUST BE BORN AGAIN!”
Here is my artist Statement:
Arcadia Cereal Killer; Battle Creek, Michigan, Barley Wine, 9% abv
Vocabulary Detectives 2 by Ruth of Teacher Park: "Run weekly vocabulary contests! As your students read their books, they fill out the Vocabulary Detective cards and put them in the Detective Jar. Have a drawing at the end of the week for the winners!" (4-6)
(theme song from Jeopardy repeat).
For many women, pregnancy means loss of energy, nasuea, and body aches. These are just a few of the many symptoms experienced by women as the growing fetus in their womb grows. However, exercise during pregnancy is vital for both mother and child. For most pregnant women, at least 30 minutes of moderate exercise daily is recommended.
I crave chocolate most of the time, but I often have to alternate between that and salty snacks. I still have not managed to get away from the carbs yet though.
tart stillness of a bush
“Do not call me ‘sir’, I work for a living.” The branch peeked out from around one of the gigantic trees. “And please, try to keep up. We need to reach the gateway.”
We have every advantage provided for us by grace. We are not limited geographically. We are not limited to time. We are not limited numerically. Because we are always in the presence of God and because God is always present with us, we have every ability to comply with the will of God to pray.
When you mindfully deal with control freaks, you can free yourself from their manipulations. Knowing how they operate will let you choose how to interact with them.
...updates.
He blotted a stray drop of ink with the care a dying man offers to his last task, deliberately, lovingly, slowly. He ended the letter with the same care, “With love that lasts beyond death, an old man.”
I don't know what the trend is.
Even though I see the coat of arms on a regular basis, Chickster's post about the Breton flag made me realize that I have yet to spot the flags for the Île-de-France and Paris. Please let me know if you see one of them before I do!
I am eating my daily fruit.
Beef Stroganoff
* Mag lev
From Bubby: ok
40) Quique Dacosta (Denia, Spain)
I have a habit of buying new 'stash' and putting it away and then not using it so both of these challenges allowed me to make use of some button brads I bought a few months back in my local TK Maxx store. I was so delighted to be able to enter the card into the Papertrey Ink challenge over at Nicole's blog here.
Hopefully this will give you some ideas so that you can go and make your own unique cockades!
“Tomorrow afternoon. 1.50pm,” I declared.
The inspiration came to me while I was watching The Walking Dead. I was bored at the drama and the angst that unfolded so much so that I wanted something else – and then it hit me. I wondered what it would be like to write a zombie story from the perspective of a zombie. This snowballed into the basis of a story that would be humorous, touching and inspirational; not things that you usually associate with the average zombie story! I then spent the next month writing the story, followed by over two months editing and polishing.
Pair one up with a few cans of healthy soup and you will be sure to stay out of the drive thru on the weekends!
After looking at how much Verizon was costing us each month, we decided to reassess our cell phone situation overall. We were ready…for smartphones.
“Whappo” said the
My experience is that if you talk too much about a projected book, you are much less likely to actually write it. Still, I will tell you this much: I am working on a third Zan-Gah book. It is in the dreaming stage right now. Whenever I get an idea, small or large, I write it down on a card. I will arrange the cards later. The story continues with Dael's self-imposed exile, as he seeks some sort of redemption or resolution of his life. He will go to live with the crimson people (introduced already in Zan-Gah and the Beautiful Country). I think I will call it Dael and the Painted People. But first I have to write it.
if you want the extra calories.
Now I realize what was going on there.
The design house's expertise in cutting leather is evident in the cut and fall of this coat. It looks more as if it has been cut from luxury cloth like satin or heavy velvet. I love the way the collar falls into a relaxed frill. It makes the perfect partner to dress up blue jeans and would also look fabulous over evening wear. And it is so warm!!! As a petite, short person I am often warned away from floor length coats by style guides, but try seeing if I care wrapped up in this when we plunge into subzero temperatures in the height of winter.
I would recommend Bell’s Original to the whisky novices as it’s a good introduction to blended whisky. Give it a try!
A platonic relationship ought not to be viewed as less than a sexual relationship. In fact, platonic partners are more likely to view the absence of sex as being the absence of an insincere gesture, either in the beginning wherein one is focused simply on achieving orgasm and doesn’t really care about the quality of the partner in all of her/his diversity of personality, or later on when the mechanical ritual of sexual gratification, having been the basis of the relationship, becomes the only way of expressing love, whereby if the sex is not particularly enjoyable, then the love is judged the same way. Furthermore, a radical examination of all insincere gestures may ensue. Platonic couples may find that even kissing begins passionate and slowly degrades into a mechanical gesture to signify love.
It turned out that the architects and designers had shortened the quotation on their own initiative, simply because the whole text would not easily fit. (This raises a host of issues regarding accuracy, authority, aesthetics, and public history and memory, which I merely mention and would not presume to address here.)
And while my mother's recipe is just about perfect in every way, I haven't exactly had the urge to dig into a meaty, cheesy slice of wintry comfort now that spring has arrived. This sock-ditching, window-opening weather has me yearning for much lighter fare.
If you don't want to drive and you don't want to walk, the third possibility is to take a boat, and if you do this, between Carmine and Cannero you will run into the imposing Castelli di Cannero, the ruins of two medieval castles set on islands in the middle of the lake. The castles have a long and pretty swashbuckling history, full of ruthless pirates, noble Milanese dukes and downtrodden serfs. For the full story, see here.
As they say, time will come, patience is a virtue… and all that…
Answer: The NP only took over the government in 1948, after WWII, after the fall of Nazi Germany. How could the National Party Government have been sympathetic to Nazi Germany when it did not even exist.
If you’ve followed my “Team Gale” vs “Team Peeta” tweets you’d have noticed that I was recently pretty obessesed with the Hunger Games book trilogy – Little did I realise that i’d be ‘living it’ to an extent.
to drink my beers with time to spare
Information about who the Laher People and what their total agenda is with changing timelines is coming in…
And He tells me I am His own;
The Handbook of Nature Study (Comstock)
The window frames are laser cut from a sheet of card stock. They fit well over the window edges, look really good, and the middle "cutout" can be used for building signs and posters.
Design is everywhere – and that’s why looking for a definition may not help you grasp what it is. The word design means different things to different people. There are broad definitions and specific ones – both have drawbacks. Either they are too general to be meaningful or they exclude too much.
I find it and the waters seem
Yesterday the family slept late (I went out and got some ice, drinks, and washer fluid for the car, cleaned it up a bit). Around 11 AM we headed south, and spent the rest of the day in Rhode Island. We had lunch at Aunt Carrie's in Point Judith (very good clam cakes, good lobster, and Cathy and I split an Indian pudding and a slice of custard pie...which I'd never had or heard of before. Good, with an odd smoky tang to it. We did a little walking around in Newport (I ducked into Busker's and got a cask pint of Shipyard IPA), then went back to Bedford.
I kept hoping for an answer, a real answer about how this family could have changed course, but it never came. It seems as if the mother still believes that the outcome couldn't have been prevented. It's terribly sad, almost more tragic than a mother's loss of teen daughters that ran away.
